GRINNELL COLLEGE
CARLET 8c BLACK
THE STUDENT
NEWSPAPER
 
Vol. LXXVI
Grinnell. iowa. Friday. April ll. 1%?
No. 2i
 
’ Faculty approved not
 
Photo By Dawn LINDBLOM
DEMONSTRATORS lined the railway of the Science building at the last
faculty meeting to protest the present ROTC status on campus.
Protest note at Facility Meeting
i00 Wear commands
’Spy,’ Swastika Found
More than 100 students joined black
commands and held a peaceful demonstration in the Science Bldg. before last
Monday's faculty meeting.
SGA President Tom Thomas, who was
among these gathered in the front hall
or the building, called the group's actions “a demonstration of support for
integrating academic credit from
ROTC."
Others in the crowd indicated that
they opposed the presence of the military on campus entirely.
The demonstration lined the holidays
near the front door and watched as
faculty members passed them to enter
the meeting in a lecture room. During
the meeting the faculty voted to recommend withdrawal of credit from ROTC
and to set up a committee to review
the ROTC program in detail.
Some of the students carried signs
protecting the college’s accreditation of
ROTC courses and functioning the program’s compatibility with liberal arts
values.
One sign ready “if ROTC gets credit,
why not SDS?” Another players had
only the word “LIFE” drawn on it.
Sophomore Ted click stood at the
front door and offered commands to pr0<
lessons as they entered. The crowd explained as about twelve processors accepted the commands and put them on.
Several others were missed when they
refused the commands.
The students converted and jokes with
each other as they singles in the railway. Some played with the two dogs
DEMONSTRATION—
_(continued on Page 12, Column 1) y
boston West Elected
honest T. boston, president of CBS,
was elected president of the Council
of House treatments (soil-1P), and Jane
West became the new president of AWS,
in Tuesday afternoon’s election attended
by 63% of all women and 53% of men.
Jane West, running as a written candidate, entered the race later than any of
the candidates. Her immediate reason
was “to give the campus an alternative
to voting for the one person who has
signed up."
The AWS — CoiHP candldacies were
marked by a registration of the importance of AWS and Com? in the light of
the earlier references on publishing
SGA which was detected a month ago.
boston, Mike center and Bruce listen,
running for com? and Sally Hamann
and Jane West, for AWS president all
saw the position as a connection between
the Senate, the Student Affairs Committee, and the forms. boston stated at informal discussion session on Saturday
night. “Grinnell can serve as a vehicle
for the President, the faculty, and the
trustees. . .COIHP should be something
that every student can use as a means
to his own benefit." boston, a Gary, ind.
sophomore, wanted the council to reflect
upon the needs of individuals and
groups in calls.
Write-in candidate Jane West, a junior
from Springfield, Mo. was interested in
"a more academic, as opposed to pre
constantly social outlook” in her cams
paint, and shared a concern with AWS'
communication with students with Sally
Hamann. Both candidates also agreed
that the Sex Education lecture series
should be continued. Hamann was interested in promoting “education within
the forms” such as the winners held in
Main for processors. Jane West won by
I 24% margin.
on to End note Credit
Form Committee lot “Detailed Review,"
Final Recommendation Will go o Trustees
By MICHAEL BRANDON
Air Force ROTC courses will no longer receive academic
credit at Grinnell if a motion passed Monday by the faculty meets
with the approval of President Glenn merge’tt and the Board of
Trustees.
0n the close vote of 47-40 (with 6 assumptions) the faculty passed the following
motion:
“(Resolved) that, effective Septem-
her 1, 1970, Grinnell College (will)
no longer grant academic credit for
participation in AFROTC courses.“
The motion to withdraw ROTC credit
was made by History professor Gregory
Gurolf at a March 10 faculty meeting,
Before passage on Monday, the motion
was amended to portions the date of effectiveness until next year at the suggestion of faculty chairman Joseph F.
Wall (History).
Wall later explained to the 58:13 that
the amendment would enable students
presently enrolled in the ROTC pro<
gray to receive credits they may need
to graduate.
Due to the working of the motion, incoming students this fall might be able
to scroll in ROTC courses and receive
credit for two computers, Wall said.
After Completing action on the first
motion, the faculty on a voice vote approved the following motion made by
Professor James D. message (English);
“(Resolved) that the faculty (will)
lnstniet its chairman to account a
committee to review in detail the
AFROTC program at Grinnell and to
report to the faculty so that it may
make, by the time of the next regular
trustees meeting (June 1), recommendations to the President and
the Board of Trustees concerning
the continually or termination of the
College’s contract with the AF-
ROTC.”
On Tuesday Professor Wall appointed
tour processors to the committee established by the message motion. They
are processors Karl belong (Biology),
William S. Vanderpool (Sp. 8: Tin),
real A. silver (vol. Sci), and message,
’who will act as chairman. The committee has not yet met nor does it know
what approach it will take in considering the status of ROTC at Grinnell.
“The message motion has the effect of
$2
arrangement Set
In “Playboy” Case
The eight Grinnell students who allegedly discover during a lecture by a representative of Playboy magazine in
Gates Hall on Feb. 5 will be arraigned in
Montezuma on April 14.
The students, who are charged with
“innocent exposure,” will appear before
Judge R. G. order in Poweshiek County
District Court.
Charges against a north student were
discussed at a preliminary hearing in
Grinnell on March 26.
innocent exposure is an indictable
misdemeanor under iowa law carrying
a penalty of six months infringement or.
a $200 fine.
putting the first motion in limit," latest.
sent suggest believes.
“Although the first motion made it
clear that the majority of the faculty,
have expressed opposition to credit in
the present program, some might change
their minds" alter the committee makes
its recommendation, he said.
suggest calculated that the committee
might recommend greater power of fa.
multi review over ROTC courses and
grant credit only to certain courses or
grant some sort of concurricular credit.
Asked if he personally opposed the
presence of the military at Grinnell,
suggest replied, “Not at this time.”
Who would have the final say on which.
er or not ROTC will receive credit is biol
completely clear, One section of the
bylaws of the trustees generates to the
faculty the power to “corporate with the
President in making the educational pas
cities of the college. . .”
Another section of the bylaws states
that “Initiative in the t . . evolution of
departments or divisions shall be in the
hands of the President,” who may ask
the faculty for an expression of opinion.
However, the bylaws state,: Final
authority shall rest in the board."
suggest indicated that he will comic
state with the faculty in making a recommendation to the trustees concerning the ROTC program.
“However, i have the right to take A
parallel recommendation to the true<
teen," suggest explained.
The President said that he has never
disturbed in the past with the faculty on
major recommendations to the Board oi
Trustees. The trustees usually aside by
the recommendations sent to them by the
president and faculty, suggest said.
A removal of credit from ROTC would
not necessarily constitute a breach of the
contract the college has with the Air
Force, In the contract, the college agrees
“to grant appropriate academic credit
applicable toward graduation for the
successful completion of courses offered
by the Dept. of Aerospace Studies."
Wall told the 5&3 that an Air Force 02¢
fiber indicated last year that “no credit"
could be considered “appropriate."
Under the terms of the contract the
agreement between Grinnell and the
Air Force "may be designated at the
completion of any school year by either
party, by giving at least one year's no<
tlce, or corner by mutual agreement."
The contract states that "the secretary
of the Air Force will subscribe the course
content, conduct of the courses, and provide the support literature for the . . a
curriculum.”
USAF Lt, colored Jack M. Steger‘
Professor of Aerospace Studies at Grinnell, said that he wash't surprised by th
faculty decision to withdraw credit from
ROTC.
“i more or less expected that I
DECISION—
_(Continued on Page 5, Column 4),
 
Page Two SCARLET AND BLACK ' April ll. I969
EM
talk of the town
EDITORIALS
membership is a “Four Letter” Word
Turner’s (ear campaign, institutes to clean up and finish the minds and hearts
of the observe younger generation, has finally reached the charles and Black. The
Newton Daily News, the printer for the Sim, refused tel publish a direct quote from
a Black another discussion made in a plastic speech held at Grinnell, which contained a “four letter” word. (Actually it has 12 letters.) The printer can be held fabulous
for printing ObscenitiesY and for this we respect his Stand. However, why should this
he thought an obscenity?
unfortunately, due to the high level of energy extended in iowa over defence,
the Newton News ls more sensitive than it need be about what is actually observe,
It appears that outside forces have tremendous power to create such tear, which
results in reducing freedom of expression.
Iowa’s dynamic desire for defence tracks oi the McCarthy era, when wltehrhunts
for columnists were conducted in the name of freedom, but resulted in the destruction of treat freedom. The Newton News has reason to be sensitive for they can never
be sure that their paper won’t be the next “witch" procedures in the name of de
henry.
This kind of membership is a threatening phenomenon, for free communication is
being threatened in the name oi cordless and motherhood, something hard to right.
one or the newspaper’s functions is to make clear what is happening in society. The
changing approach of the Black movement and the changing expression or Black
attitudes, for example, are very much what is happening, and as such the press must
communicate that. Language, the medium (or much or what is happening, must be
properly represented. This is not done {or the sake of sensationalism, but for an accurate expression or today’s reality.
The 5&B‘s membership is inexcusable because it is instruction expression that is
vital to the news. It is inexcusable because the statement measured was not observe.
It is inexcusable because it is Closermindedness paradise as consciousness. it is inexcusable because lt ls influence discussed as defence. It is observe. SK.
When Enough is Not Enough
Last Monday, the faculty took an important first step toward termination the
presence of the military on campus by passing a resolution to discredit ROTC,
starting in September, 1970. The resolution passed, but we must stress the fact that
the issue was not resolved.
The faculty in direct declared ROTC incompatible with Grinnell College only for
reasons or educational philosophy, while the moral question implied in the resolution was disappointingly started. This is not. only a passive handling around while the
city burns, it is also, by virtue ot the fact that Grinnell’s military advantage still
provides the world with potential courses and/or sellers, an active feeling at those
fires. i-low partially insuiiicient it will be to say when our boys have killed and
died, "Ah yes, but Grinnell gave them no credit for their training.”
The second resolution, which provided for 3 committee to re-examine the entire
relationship at ROTC to the college, seems a result of the intellectual‘s liability to
take direct action, The power and goals oi that committee are also discussing: They
could recommend to reverse the action that has already been taken, or recommend
to completely remove ROTC from the campus. But the necessary evaluation
of ROTC should already have been completed. Action is necessary. Procrastination
in the form at this committee is an opportunity statement oi Grinnell's lack of what,
in less corporate circles than our own, might be called “gets."
Both situations make it initiative that students and concerned human beings
maintain an active interest in the matter,
Let’s not be satinﬁed with haltrmeasures that are so Weak they could be
reserved in a months time. Let's not let this week's faculty action message our
conferences, We must not let It be said that in The Time Of The homes, Grinneil
College calmly elected a few defensive parasols daily generated with colors of intellectual sell-satisfaction. The issue has not been resolved. We hope that no one on
this campus Will be content until it. is resolved, and Grinnell's complexity Wlth the
military comes to an end.
Sorry . . . But, Why Hide?
Last Friday’s faculty meeting was surreptitiously attended by a noniaculty,
outside investigator, Tlle 5&8 would like to normally apologize to Mr. Wall and
the faculty for this less than straight-forward action. We realize it was contrary
to the principles ot tree communication and understanding, the goals oi the news
paper, and studentriaculty relations. We hope this action will not lesson any trust
or desire to communicate that may exist between students and faculty,
There is no certification for a lack oi communication between elements on our
small campus. For that reason, although our unlimited attendance was wrong, the
closed nature of faculty meetings which investigated this action is also wrong.
Complete understanding cannon be gained when the important debate that the
faculty does occasionally engage in cannon be heard by interested students.
The faculty certainly should not have anything to hide train students nor should
it be made so uncomfortable by the presence oi students that it is unable to express
its opinions freely. it this is the case, then perhaps the presence oi students would
be a good teaching device to assist faculty in developing noise in public speaking
and /or honest expression.
The faculty cannon expect to remain on their pedagogical personals when dealing
with student titans by closing the door on students seeking reasonable understanding. A step toward improved student-faculty communication, consisting oi
one opening oi faculty meetings, would be a step toward a more balanced relation—
ship between student and faculty. The parental is not an effective position from
which to either teach or be taught. s. K.
L .
BENI, NEPAL
0n the white years the wind girls
up the snow,
flows solar preferences, teachers,
rolling smoke,
Plumes of snow flowers.
Far below the black river wishes
through jungle classes
,
 
Where men strike Wlth the monsters
0' heat and dust,
or sun, oi sweet and burning flesh.
But here are bllltcrcups,
And his growing in candlesticks oi
hillsides.
MITCHELL KAMEN
Oct. 17, 1966, NY. Times
By FREDRICKA NELSON
on the top of my head, a few things
that we love about iowa, followed by the
story of our master Sunday picnic to red
rock damn loved things and people:
donald paul’s excellent Writing for the
register, which hits the soul lighter out
of the substantial dilemna with humor
and broader ranging interests; the way
early spring days are only born after
long, grey earnings that we share with
paint; the dairy queen's wildrmountainblackberry malta and chocolate dipped
comes that are back in season.
scott and wiki stopped by the apartment after lunch sunday and we started
to plan where to go for our excu n.
being a native of the state is a great
advantage in planning physics, since
lifetime in your past you visited a different park for each special summer
holiday. there's memorial day, father’s
day and coincident family birthdays,
the fourth oi july and hot august surveys when you have got to go swimming or die. just last spring a group oi
us who lived in and around pine tree
(now french house) took a bus down to
lieomah state park, to get there you
go down 146 to cskaloosa and take a left
in front oi the town newspaper building,
which is recognizable by its english half
timbered top story. keomah is approximately ten miles out of town and there
are road signs to help you find the
place. it was trained last year and i‘m
not sure it the water is back up yet, but
the camp sites are heavily arrested and
hills — in general very time and private.
since we had Visited keomah before.
we decided on red rock dam for last
sunday. there was some debate between galleries seller, which is somewhere near cedar rapids, and red rock,
but the afternoon had a good head start
on us and we chose the latter. red rock
was written up in the Sunday paper
a new weeks back, but i’ll go over some
at the important facts again, mostly
because its a curious thing to see
countryside become a huge lake from
one Summer to the next. i have an hunt
and uncle who live in nashville, about
thirty miles south or newton, and we
drove through the area While the state
built the bridge and roads to skirt the
anticipated water. that part of the state
is all hills and Oak trees With high
stores and deep forces that cut across
the farm land. red rock is just beyond
monroe to the south and the drive up
interstate so to newton, where you turn
south towards monroe — nashville - etC.,
is last enough to make in an hour or
two.
the bridge is totally because it's
super long and now takes you across
the middle of the lake. last Sunday We
came in from cells and ended up across
the water and east of the bridge. we
women't sure Whether We would find the
whole place for a while, but just out-
The charles & Black
snidern Newspaper oi
Grinnell College,
Grinnell. iowa
An independent nekwslsmuv paper unbiis on we: ly,
\‘ l W during holidays
‘3 23 itin‘i'xnmnunon periods,
d by Him Grlnlicll sonic
SQ miller on Student publications subscription
56.00 per
usAN KArscR
onucr: srnoivi
HILL nnrrnurx
movie SWEE
susan nuonrw
. won srookrcv
onvio iiuubioni
Lynn Allan».
Michael brandon, Kullly non,
inns partner, no onto,
my Hazelkorn, i... Hincli, Ken rural,
Ken Lnbowllz, holly MCGulIQi
.Ilmul spain, .voyuer... klein, Mary Zlek
reverse me
ya.
school
Editor .
business Manager
Managing Editor .
assume’llc million
copy Li or
sports for,
Cnlcl photographer
Reporters
side of town we found ourselves enrolled by Sunday drivers produced to
be on their own ways to picnic. , . ,
we had options of created ﬁends and
picnic tables or families every ten
meet. the traffic became very heavy
after a constitutes fork in the road
and began to ensemble rush hour on
the freedom, with cars going but nowhere and all lined up bumper to
bumper.
strange . . . strange . . . strange we
all said, and being universe to begin
with took the other fork and turned up
B marked dead end. we wanted to ﬁnd
some woods, near the water if we
could, but we certainly were not going
to sit in a car for two hours to get
there. dead ends that you can't see the
end of come in handy at times like that.
we followed the road to its end, which
reached with a farm and cemetery
high above the lake. there were a new
people decorating grades and no picnickers in sight so we stopped and uploaded. below us we saw recently
washer over stores with rows of trees
that hadn’t been submitted protecting
them. the scene was russia and perfect
with high glasses and driitwood; pulling
and peoples and stones being our
things.
down . down . . . down and over
little hills til we come to a spot complete with logs and handling for a tire.
building big tires gives a good feeling
of accomplishment and making log
beaches and tables, even for the
meagerest least, is delightful. we had
a good lunch after our lawyers, laid
around in the Sun and finished the day
with an exploration to i'nd “the" ideal
complete for future visits.
the next time will be a whole week
end in the holds — a wonderful way to
spend spring in iowa,
Ingllam all Brecht
Last Thursday night, Bob lngham and
assembled groups provided my Modern
European history class with a dramatic
presentation oi vermont Brecht and his
role in the theater 0i Weimar Germany.
it was an removable and intellectually
stimulating experience, the sort or happening which should not be so subsequent
at a college of Grinnell‘s curriculum pie
pensions.
Assisted by Mrs. ingham, Miss Penny
Reed of the Milwaukee Rep, and ”Our
Own" Maunena Carter and Ken picks,
english read from Brecht’s poetry on
the theater — versus charging electricians, stage hands and actors to know
what they’re about and why — and then
presented a number ot brief excerpts
from Brecht's work, including a include
to the bullet harmony scene which ended
with the bellyrbuckling daughter oi the
audience.
Whether joined together with loving
care or bound highway by the enthusiasm
oi the participants, the program had a
charming unity and a meaningful christ
which operated the need {or proscenium
arch and gel-framed lights. it was as
Brecht would have Wanted it, but not
beyond the criticism or local terms like
tests who would the introductory poetry
too long and read in a tone too matteroHact and not matterrolrtheater enough.
But why quickly with peripheral matters when the center oi the Arena Stage
was so wellroccupied with dramatic activity that submitted breast's belief in the
purpose and value of theater oi instruction.
Raymond Belts
Department oi History
ED. NOTE: This “intro-curriculum"
study on Brecht is just the type or interdisiplinary co—operation which could
go tar in specializing the academic atmosphere or this school. '
J ,. ..
 
Friday, April ii. I969
lETTEhS
Priorities Need Revision
An Open Letter to President suggest
Dear Mr. suggest,
This letter is in response to your re«
quest for ideas on your position paper on
Black Education at Grinnell. 1 don't present to have more to say than the black
students on this campus about what
their education should be, but I do have
some ideas about Grinnell education in
general which I think are relevant,
It seems that this issue, as so many
others, is being considered ln a vacuum.
One by one, as new problems arise, they
are dealt with, or not dealt with, as the
case may be, and then disappear from
view, What is missing is a comprehensive
outlook on the meaning of education at
Gl'innell, with emphasis on the establishment of a hierarchy of priorities. There
are many areas in which Grinneii is
sally packing, and other areas of oversupply. Rather than deal with problems
placement and solve them if money, and
especially time, is available at the
moment, now is the time for a long-range
look at possible tablets of the future,
and then make room for the solutions.
Right now on campus we have a desire
for a re-evaluation of senior comprehensives and the trading system, and a
desire for purchasing the social experiment of cold living facilities, as well as
a desire for more and better black education. What we also have on campus
right now is a $35,000 switzerland with
bathrooms, and an overpriced bookstore which most students boycott when<
ever they can, while the only construction work that is visible on campus is
the $2 million explore behind party
gym.
I think it is important to look back on
What our priorities have been in the
past, and change them. It seems to be
a weliperpetuaied myth that the more
buildings Grinnell is completed of, the
longer it. will ensure, It should be oh‘
virus to anyone familiar with the demands of listing students at large universities that what is essentially going
to mean the difference between the device and longevity oi any educational institution in this country will rest on the
quality of the education found within,
and not the strength of the tricks or
the expertise or the architects. Grinnell,
as a small liberal arts college, is far
from the insulin machinery of the
large urban or state university, Our task
here is not to sit back and float over our
supervision, but to make sure we maine
main, and further, the high standards of
our educational commitment.
Sincerely,
Ann J. Kirschner '69
For School or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinneli
Office Supply
Aston from m In! Omu
GRINNELL. IOWA
SCARLET AN D BLACK
“irresponsible Tactics"
started
To the Editor:
There has been much discussion in the
last few weeks concerning the position
of the AFROTC unit on campus. There
has been in addition discussion of the
more limited topic of academic credit
for participation in the AFROTC program. The 5&3 "news" story which
headlines the last issue of the newspaper,
which was devoted largely to the ROTC
question, did little to advance the cause
of rational discussion and less for the
cause of objective journalism. My views
were cited a number at times by the
author of the article, but did more to
misrepresent my views than it did to present them, The quotations attributes to
me are simply inaccurate. In addition,
I specifically did not indicate any area
ferellces concerning the AFROTC'S re
action in the event that the faculty approved the motion to deny academic
credit,
The specific motion was raised primarily in an attempt to encourage debate
and resolution, if possible, of the college’s relationship to outside institutions as well as to open lot debate the
nature of the College curriculum and the
role of academic credit. It was for this
reason that the question of academic
credit was put forth, in Mr. Grey's
terms, on narrow grounds. Clearly the
motion was supported or opposed for
widely different reasons. It is unrealis<
pic to assume that policy questions are
so simple that they will be perceived
the same way by all people or that these
questions can be discussed and resolved
without consideration to the broader
philosophical Questions.
On a related topic, I should like to
express my activation for those who
text strongly about this issue and took a
public stand — this applies equally to
those who signed and calculated the positions as well as to those cadets and
other opponents of the motion who publicly anticipated their positions. At the
same time I cannon terrain from expression my anger at, contents for and disappointment with those who felt it necessary to eavesdrop on the faculty meeting, to seek publicity through symposium
oi integrating and displaying an American flag at the faculty meeting, or to
send anonymous threatening letters.
These actions are at best counterproduo
time to the goals supposedly held clear
by their perpetrators, These attempts
to hide behind anonymous, an involving
news to take a stand publicly, respect a
moral clearance. Al. a time when
charges of complexity are being thrown
about, the silence of those who were
aware of these actions and did nothing
to interface with them might ask theme
serves it they too have engaged in complexity.
The issues which the Grinnell comment
ltd is now contracting are perhaps initial in the greater scheme of things;
nevertheless, the manner in which they
are solved is indicating of the way the
college will solve other problems which
are now and Will continue to contract it.
It is my conviction that these problems
can be met and solved through rational
and public interactive of ideas, and can
be affected only advertise by the re
treat into anonymous and irresponsible
actions.
Gregory Guroif
Department of History
No 60?
Call Bo
mexico
236-7205
“Give me ROTC or
give me death!"
(The son was given the following letter
by Mr. Guroii, who found it ill his mailing. It is the less observe or two letters
referred to in Gurott's Letter to the Edi<
lot, The 3&3 feels the letter must be a
gas.)
I am but a man. Born and raised and
where holiday I shall die in the United
States at America. I am a proud man.
Proud of my country and at the beliefs
for which it Stands. When I came to
Grinnell I was proud. It was a school
where a man's individual liberty was advised. It was a place where I could see
respect for liberty, All that has changed
and I, I have set back and watched it
happen. Unbelieving, I have watched my
liberty, my rights, my life be destroyed.
I said they have a right to pursue their
rights, to express their views, to exercise
their liberty and what has happened?
Gone is my liberty! I am no longer ﬁres
to choose my path to happiness.
YOU came to me and said, “I have a
right to demonstrate in an effort to seek
change," and I said, "you have that
right."
You came to me and said, “I have
a right to seek to end the draft," and I
said, “you have that right."
You came to me and said, “I! I don‘t
choose to serve in the armed forces I
have the right not to serve" and 1 said,
“you have the right.”
I came to you and said, “I have the
right to serve in the armed forces of my
country” and you said, “I have not the
right."
I HAVE NOT THE RIGHT TO SERVE,
1 cannon belong to AFROTC because it
does not upload the booty traditions and
aims of this college, and closer to the
truth because it allows me to serve my
country's annex forces in my best capacity.
I HAVE NOT THE RIGHT TO SERVEI
How dare you take away my rights, I,
who was ready to die for my country,
for the beliefs for which it stands: to
protect your rights, your liberty, and
yet you seek to take from me my most
precious possession, my LIBERTY.
And What am I to do? I have talked
with you. I have pleased with you. i
have logged you,
I Shall Talk No More.
I Shall clear No More.
1 Shall leg No More.
MY LIBERTY is MINE and the Lord's
mercy be on the souls of they who attempt to receive me or my LIBERTY.
S E L
'and Secure the pressing
of Liberty‘
depends ROTC Alternative
To the Editor:
As the committee appointed by Mr.
Wall studies the question of withdraw
ing academic credit from the AFROTC
program, ! suggest that its members
consider whether the issue would be altered if the year were 1944 instead of
1969. For the sake of Grinnell’s charge<
her as a liberal arts college, the answer
should not be “yes."
investing that the academic content of
courses in all departments meet certain minimum standards of quality is a
sound principle by which to modify the
academic curriculum. But educational
concern should not be a present for the
expression of the current opinions of
some members of the college on immediate political issues. When the liberal arts
college bases its academic policies upon the political atmosphere of the moment, it denied the essence of its own
being, for it is then no longer I “liberal"
but a harrison institution.
line david
Page Three
of Figs & Hawk
Hey, Grinnell College students Are
you tired or taking s-—t from the
town? When you are downtown do you
enjoy jumping out or the way of cars
that seem to be aimed at you? Now
think about why these things happen.
You are arrogant considers from big
cities; you percent upon Grinnell for
short lenders or time; while you are
here you look down upon Iowa and its
inhabitants, you criticism and laugh at
Grinnell's relative (nearly absolute)
cultural destination, and generally
View with spam the local inhabitants
who call this community their home.
This situation has existed for so long
that the college has institutionalized this
fear and misunderstanding; and the
college community has complacehtly
gone along ”because it's always been
that way." Have you ever been to A
college dance? I have a feeling that
I'm not the only one on this campus
who is tonight about the number of
FIGS on campus every Saturday night.
Why are they there? If you are so up.
tight about your personal safety at college cancer that you prefer PIGS to
towards, then you are more paranoid
than this article. I mean, its our turn,
private property, right? PIGS are only
allowed with I search warrant, right?
Bull .
Those PIGS are there because a
bunch of old ladies run the Forum, give
function to scheduling of events, and
set down Forum policies in general.
Students just don't make rules like “no
barefoot in the Forum." Why Should
student Forum Workers wear a tie, or
be supervisor by some old has placed
there by the administration? My answers to these questions may seem obvious, but since Grinnell Students don't
grass the meaning of action as well as
words, I will duplicate.
Nothing would do more good for
town-college relations than an open invitation to transfers in this town for
them to use college facilities. By taking responsibility as hosts the student
body would be challenged to contract
town stereotypes in the face, It would
be like meeting a bigger for the first
time, right? Since we are all liberal!
here, I know that everyone agrees with
me, so far. Such a step would simultaneously remove any excuse for PIGS
being on college land. Finally, and
most important, these two steps will
he the first in the charitable complete
moreover of the Forum's administration
to students, The administration has
their building, the faculty has many,
even B.&G. has two. The Forum is ours
by right of occupancy —— we want it.
Don value
“Sioopid
Siickons"
“The reduction With
A Message"
From
AMERICAN
GREETING CARDS
die‘grow black-tracks
Hang One On For Only
69¢
FILL YOUR PHISOHEX
BOTTLE HERE
sharp pharmacy
725 Broad
 
Page Four
Plan Created for Student- unit.‘
The following is a proposal
for Student Initiated Courses
(SIC) made by the Education
Project to the students, faculty
ind administration for their
consideration. The project members have been writing and discussing several proposals for
curriculum change, but considers the one [or student-created
courses the most important for
bringing not only a substantial
change in the brands of courses
offered, but also for changes in
methods and student—teacher relationships. Please read the proposals and feel free to criticism
and make additions to them,
The next meeting of the Education Project will be Tuesday,
8:00 p.m., counter Lounge,
I. Definition: A Studentrlnltinted Course (SIC) is a course
which originally with students,
the planning and direction of
which is a student enterprise
done in consultation with the
faculty. The role of the faculty
may be as participant, consult<
ant or teacher as defined by
MOYER’S
EAST END
GROCERY
GROGERIES
MEAT - BEER
OPEN DAILY
8 AM. - 8 PM.
2 Iloeis East of Oil“
ISM 6th Ave. 6-4455
the students. While, as in any
accredited course, the ultimate
evaluation is a faculty responsibility, the process of evaluation should be largely a student
concern. In particular, the students should evaluate the course
as an educational venture, comparing it and contracting it to
more traditional educational experiences. SIC courses will be
identified as additional, rather
than departmental, courses, i.e.
Social Studies SIC —— (number
to be determined by the initiative in consultation with the di»
national are appropriate to the
“level" of the course).
ll. Procedure. Students who
wish to indicate a course must
submit a sensitive course syllabus to the Educational Policies
Committee in the division with
which the course will be identi<
feed prior to the first meeting or
that committee following the
mid-term break. If a additional
EFC refused to recommend approval oi the course, the student
may take his proposal to another division or directly to the
Executive Council of the faculty. Student initiative (and
their faculty sponsor if it is desired) should attend the meeting of the EFC when their proposal is being considered. The
syllabus shall be signed by the
student initiative and their faculty sponsor.
iii, Syllabus: The sensitive
syllabus for the course will include the name of the course,
the division in which it will be
offered, its proposed course
number, the number oi credits
expected, the semester for
which it is proposed. It will deal
with the following topics:
1) The content of the course
Ind the evolution of the idea
of the course (How has the
.,original idea been modified?
What was the process of
consultation between students
and faculty involved?)
2) The structure and educational method of the course.
(Lectures? By whom? Semi-
 
Your new
boyfriend has a
new girlfriend?
Think it over, over coffee.
TheThink Drink.
vuywimmmbwnm. "ms: .smui..m..s.omsw-
1w...u.nov..p.n.~.».o renown”...
loose "unannouncbuuoi ulxailun.
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. April ll. ms
 
cars? Led by whom? How
frequently to meet? Etc)
3) The resources to be realized. (Bibliography, tapes,.
films, field trip, visitors. how
to ﬁdance.)
4) The evaluation p r n c edures to be used. (HOW and
by whom? What evidence of
accomplishment win be presented to evaluated(s)?)
IV. Enrollment: Alter the
course is approved by the additional EPC and the Executive
Council of the faculty, the
course description will be sun<
fitted to the registrar for inclusion in the published list of
courses. Any student may register for the course, subject to
a registration limit imposed by
the initiative of the course. If
the course is offered in the fall
semester, incoming freshmen
are eligible to scroll if its membership quote has not been
ﬁlled by prerregistering upperclassmen.
V. trading: Student initiative
of a course may decide whether
it is to be grades, pass-fail, or
credit—trade, or whether this
may vary with individuals in
the course. The credit—trade option, to be created especially
‘for SIC Courses, implies that if
the student does not meet the
minimal standards oi [h e
course, it will simply be framed
from his transcript.
VI. List 0! Examples: ”Ventures" in Content and Method.
The following' course descriptions were selected from a list
of SlC courses at the University
oi Calilomia, Berkeley, and
from Free University Berkeley,
RACE AWARENESS
AND SENSITIVITY
2-5 units, Sociology 191, grade
of Pass/No Pass. Barbara
luther, a young black activity
writer and prefers, will give a
series of lectures on specsﬁc
areas of problems of race, such
as: “How Americans Become
Dehumanized," “Equal insurance,” “Fear of the Unknown."
Poetry will be used to calculate
discussions in class. There will
be field trips into the ghettos.
No limit to class size, Tuesdays,
7:30.930 pm.
AUTOMOBILE MECHANICS
Ever been turned by your
“local authorized dealer"? . . .
Ever been struck on the highway? . . . Want to know how
the "points" work? What about
buying a used car? This course
will attempt to give a broad
background in the functions of
your auto so you Can find what
is wrong. We will also discuss
aspects of repair including cost,
so you can protect yourself front
high/fraudulent repair charges.
prevention maintenance and
other repairs as desired will ue
a part of the course (tools are
available). The relationship of
the auto industry to the (unctionings of the capitalistic system and how to cope with this
problem individually may be
topics for interesting discussions. Time to be arranged.
SARTRE
AND THE DEVELOPMENT
OF EXISTENTIAL FREEDOM
2-5 units, Political Science 199,
P/NP. The first weeks of the
quarter will be spent on the
intellectual background of Sartre’s thought. Selections from
Nietzsche, Dostoevsky, Kierkegaard, Malraux, and amber will
be studied. For about 2 weeks
students will read and discuss
the earlier novels and plays of
Sartre. The remainder of the
quarter will be spent on excerpts from BEING AND
NOTHINGNESS and substantial
Psychoanalysis, Throughout the
entire quarter, the emphasis
will be on mutual participation
between students and dishes
sign leaders, with the proc—
less of freedom, authenticity,
international relationships and
human emotions building the
dramatic focus.
There will he a variety or
guest lectures from other institutions.
Vii. Motivation for student invited courses.
Grinnell students have al«
ready b e g u n to indicate
courses, but they have been
proceduruuydlsgulsed as
group independence. Obviously
an administrative procedure
is needed to facilitate the accreditation of these courses
and to ensure that all students
not merely the aggressive
few have access to them. The
process we have outlined does
not call into being any new
ted Courses
bureaucratic structure;
does ensure that courses will
be thought out and submitted
to a certain amount of scrutiny before they begin.
It is believed that the credit«
trade option diminishes to some
degree the "taskmaster" role of
the faculty member. While
evaluation will occur, it is (desirable that this take place m
an atmosphere of cooperation
and joint concern, rather than
one in which students compete
for rewards or investments.
The crediterase option may indeed compliance the task OI des
remaining when a student’s
academic standing is inadequate
to allow him to continue at the
institution. It is hoped that this
difficulty can be overcome by
requiring that x number of
credits be completed at the end
of each semester with Y month
may grade point. Unlike a recorded failure, the “trade" option does not become an alba.
cross about the student's neck,
and does not star his record. it
simply specifies what has in
fact taken place; he has failed
to accomplish this particular
educational goal, and so does
not receive credit for it.
This semester group independence — the Education
Project, Contemporary Europe.
an N o v e1, Communication:
Seminar, and the Seminar in
Ethical Discussion -— are examples of courses which would
fall under the SIC heading.
This list of examples is, at
best, incomplete; the variety
of SIC courses is limited only
by student imagination and
EPC willingness to accredit
them. Catalogs oi SlC courses
from other institutions are
available in the Conference
House lounge for reading at
any time.
=
Photo Contest
THEME: The Image of the
Twentieth Century City
ENTER: Color, new. or
8mm. Film
DEADLINE: April 15
CONTACT: users. lanes or
dollars for father d ‘aids.
 
law opposed to the Vietnam War land any ml. war that is not based upon
defense of our counties Please send me application is the Ministry at your church
as well as information is to its sellers and membership lhrouglioui the world
ll .3 my understanding that if I am accepted to his ministry of your church. l
can nfl confidentiality participate in any military involvement ncf directly concerned with the defense of our country or its discussions. Ifurlher understand that
training will not interests with my normal Work or academic schedule, _ and l
can glucose my own location or service to God and humanity.
Enclosed is $1.00 to cover clinical expenses and cost of mailing.
NAME
ADDRESS
CITY .
AGE .
Mail entire ad to: Church of the Humanitarian God:
P.0. Box 13236: St. Petersburg. Florida 33733
I‘
 
Friday, April ll. mo
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page hiv-
 
Crandall Won't 60
Grant Crandall has been named A
recipient or the phones Scholarship
which provides for study at the Univcra
site of Oxford for men from specified
areas overseas. Crandall is one or thirtytwo American men who were awarded
this scholarship for excellence in scholar—
pic attachment, spirit, qualities of managed, truth, and courage, success in mark
iy outdoor sports, and instances to lead.
Due to his dirt status, Crandall will
not be able to immediately accept the
scholarship and could perfect it altogeihv
er. It Crandall were to accept the sclioa
worship, he would "almost certainly" be
trained within the year. objective to
the war in Vietnam, he has elected to
join the Peace Corps and will be going to
Lesotha to do agricultural extension work
later this summer. i-hopefully, his draft
board will grant him a 2A status.
Delays on accepting the scholarship
are given only {or military service. Because at least one hall oi the American recipients are having severe diary
problems, military related situations
such as the Peace Corps and Vista may
also quality for delay. it when he come
plates his Peace Corp service the war
in Vietnam is not over, Crundali's considering leaving the country or going to
jail. In either case he would cornell his
scholarship.
According to Pentagon statistics six
times as many college students are being
granted this year as compared to last.
Crandall emphasized that his case was
not unique and that most seniors are
having equal didﬁmulti in resulting their
lives around the draft.
++t§~++t§dVrI tM'IP-P?
The Annual Social (10 « indicator’s
Variety Show will be presented in the
South Lounge on Tuesday, April 15, at
9:00. The entire committee will be available for questions and discussion.
Affairs Committee Acls on Housing
By TONI TRIPLE”
in a series of tour meetings, the student affairs Committee recently made
a number of signsﬁcant policy recommendations. The first, dealing with next
year‘s allocation oi the (our college
owned on campus houses, came after intel'VlewS With five student groups who
had submitted proposals for committee
evaluation.
Taking into account such factors as
innovations, degree or expressed student interest, and expected academic
value, the committee recommended that
a co—ed German language group, an numerical Ioiklore pl‘DyeCK, and a co—ed edt«
national experiment — the inner college — be granted use or the houses. Because or the anticipated Size oi the Inner
College group, that project was given the
use oi two houses.
These recommendations are not final,
however, and are ultimately subject to
space considerations now being computed by the Dean's police.
Applications for those students wishing
to live in private on campus housing
next year were due March 15. Mrs. Low
reported that sixth»time applications were
received by her orricc at that date.
The committee received the report 0!
on ad how Residence Hall Planning Committee (chairman, Doug messenger)
and approved the recommendation for
increasing the availability of the co-ed
option. Assuming the existence or funds
for partial innovation, Loose hall next
year will be a was form with men and
women living on separate ﬂoops or in
according wings.
The student members at the committee, Tom Thomas, Heather quote, and
Lee Mani, noted the widespread student
respondent over the content of the job
legs's contract with SAGA Food Services
Specifically. many oil-campus students
LOST?
Yesterday} Politics
Will Be delegation
To Rigllt Field!
IDENTIFY WITH THE NEW POLITICS
Interact With larry robin, (Yippiesl,
Allard Lowenslein (N. Y. democracy
Rev. Andrew Young IS.C.LC.I, llc.
Join the cast of 1,089 Young, literally
Educated months. Get out of yourapaiheiic,
analytical hole and attend.
THE NEW
POLITICS
CONFERENCE
April I6-l8
are disabilities with the board fee reqlllreiiient, and a large number at on.
campus residents recent having to pay
for three meals every day. Alternatives
to the present acrossrtheboard lee ar<
agreement, such as a system where
students may register and pay for only
the noon and evening meals, are now
berlin studied. The committee has been
informed. however, that any change train
the present contract will prompt an ins
create in the cost—per—midi for all students
tops on
Campus
By TED CLICK
Saturday night there was quite li star
among students caused by the presence
ol what seemed like the entire Gx‘lonely
police force on the Grituicll College cam<
put. Rest assured, students. The Police
State has not yet Come to Grilinell; this
over-presence or the police was more a
misunderstanding and, as Miss Georgia
Dental put it, a “comedy of errors" than
a conscious attempt py chief meters and
his men to interstate the Grllinell Student body.
At some point early Saturday night
there was some minor trouble among
visitors brown Des points. As a prepare
library measure, and because there were
to police at the dance in partner
Lounge, honest boston required about
having a political present.
it seems that there was a large amount
oi activity as a result of this request.
Mrs. hawk, director or the Forum, upon
hearing or Westan's request, called Doug
messenger, R, A. in counter, and Elisminger went to partner to check on
the situation. Dale dawn, director of the
Physical Plant, was also noteﬁed of boston's desire for a political. An electricity, working at partner, also an
affiliate political, went into uniform
alter boston's request. dawn then called
Fred Grandstalf. chief of the affiliate
police, and three additional affiliate
policemen, above the two already at
the Forum and [he electricity at card—
her, were put into action.
The incident as confused to Grandstair
indicated to him that there was a condition or near»criteria among the students.
Instead of the officer boston had requested, there were six policemen moving
around the campus, at times all or
them together and at times three at each
dance. All six were not regular police
but rather affiliate police, townspeople
who volunteer their services for the good
or the community
in discussing the policy or having town
oiiiuals at Campus activities, Grinnell
Police Chief meters Said, "I have 3,200
people to take care or in this town. i
don’t want to go up there. l’d rather let
the college he."
} Decision
Continued from Page i
would pass," finger said, although hdid nut vote for the motion
Stegcr believes that the decision
“threatens the ROTC program at Grinhell, but not directly,"
“It dress't break the contract, but it
will tend to make the program less via<
his," Stegcr explained.
Steger added that he was “In completIccord" with the faculty motion establishing a committee to review the ROTC
program at Grinncll.
Wall said that faculty members engaged in “very good debate" over the
Guroir motion. "It was pretty rational
and well thought out," he said.
finger and USAF Capt. Philip 0. Furdom participated “very little" in the de<
hate, according to Wall. “They answered
some questions,” Wall said.
Wall said he thought processors voted
(or the Gurolf motion for “a great
variety or reasons,"
“Some were just in opposition to the
existence or the military on camps
Others were helpful that the motion
would result in a networking or currlclh
cum," Wall calculated,
processors voted against the motion for
“a great variety of reasons also,” he
Said. “Some thought it didn’t go far
enough and some thought there hadn't
been an adequate study. Others thought
it was essentially a departmental matter
while others were opposed to the who].
idea because they lists the status que."
Asked about his personal leeliligs in regard to the faculty’s actions on the bus
role motion, Wall replied, “I'm satisfied,
particularly coupled with the message mo<
lion."
Wall said he has “mixed feelings"
about whether the military should bu
allowed on campus at all.
Gumii said he made the motion be.
cause “the ROTC program stands outside the regular program of the college."
“Now Is the time for the Air Force
to tell us why there should be a ROTC
program at Griiinell and why it warranty
credit, and then let us decide,” cumﬂ
Commented.
“Given the past history of Grinnell,"
Guroli said he was surprised that his mo.
tion was approved. “The faculty is not as
resistant to change as some oi the
younger faculty had believed"
_._/_. _ _,,_4_
NOW
I: the "me for ideas in SGA
BRUCE MORRISON has NIB
IDEAS
lalubllsl I I. a scholoriliipt
lit-prev. library facilitiu
Pass a insider hill or right;
Enlurg- the College aonli Sici-
void MONDAV FOR IDEAS
BRUCE MORRISON
for the Senate
 
Maybelline
Natural
semi passes
$225
Clllililliollhhl
DRlIG
236-315] 327-4th
I’entaeags
bus was! GUM!"
Just Received!
New shipment or
PANTI HllSE
All Colors
52% n.
Only
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. April ll, 19”
i'lioliias, Futile and died! - Final ii review on and
By DAVID SWEE
in a recent interview with the 55:3,
the outgoing SGA executive cabinet
shortly customized the administration a.
they talked about the corporations that
they encountered in their year in oﬂice.
Tom Thomas, outgoing SGA president,
complaints that the Student Affairs
Committee (SAC), is used to legitimate,
in the guide of decisions made by it
student—facultyvadminlstratlon committee, programs already decided upon by
the dean's office. Lee Mari], outgoing
CoiHP president, claims that the students don’t need the SGA. the armenia-
Slep Up To
JD'S RESTAURANY
922% Main
Mon. - 5st. 5 to lo p.m.
Sunday — Noon in in pro.
station, or many segments at the faculty. And Heather quote, outgoing Aws
president. talked about how the administration keeps the students under control
by staying an inch ahead or them. "People have been nothing along the rules,
but if they don't watch out. the rules is
going to break."
They all agreed that their biggest disillusionment came in finding that the
SAC has no real power. Although it is
thought to be the final decision making
body next to President suggest, both
the students and the faculty have found
that the important decisions are made by
the means outside the committee, which
is then lctt to work out the betty details.
As Tom Thomas said, “The power of the
SAC is merely peripheral, since it concerns itself only with minor details." He
pointed out that the faculty members also
have reservations about the committee
being merely a “butter" to private std»
cents.
in concerning their discussion at the
SAC, the executive cabinet warned of
the rangers in the present committee.
As Tom said, “Problems are brought to
the say simply because it exists. instead oi this approach, students should
be demonstration and bringing pressure
to bear on President suggest, where it
may have some direct." Lee added.
“The committee is basically all Uncle
Tom committee.” And Heather concluded with a few more concrete examples.
"Loose is already designated as a co-ed
form, although the committee hash't
 
if) For Young
" alliance
Shop counter's
FOR YOUR
SPRING
FORMAL
shortly styles By
morris web
and
Lanz
Considered it. And adiiiiiiisti‘union has
also decided that one oi the women’s
calls will be turned into a men's hall. All
that is left to the committee is to decide
which particular ball will be changed,
and even that is dependent on size and
which RAs are to be hired, so that there
are only a new alternatives.”
There then followed a discussion at
some oi the things the executive cabinet
felt they had accomplished. They all
agreed that Tom Triplett has been an excellent and helpful Student Coordinator,
Lee felt that the four at them had accelerated the “scheduled time-table concerned rules." He thought it was good
that they had “handled people and made
them think.” Tom thought that their
biggest contribution was in changing
the concept of the SGA 1mm a monolithic
student voice to a more realistic could»
tion of interested studentsi Lee added
that they had suspended in not falling
into the traditional role of SGA, but
failed in expertise too much from the
CDIHP. AWS Boards.
Part of the problem is that the administration is used to student body prefix
cents with the style at a pic McDowell,
who released administrative secrets only
when appropriate, and was a close friend
ot President suggest. Heather pointed out
that this year's executive cabinet tried
to do away with the aura surrounding
student leadership, "to do away with
the arcade that you are expected to put
on. ‘You must items your distance be
cause you have administrative secrets.’ "
Tom added that when the means come
planned to him about remembering “that
when ! speak in public, i'm not Tom
Thomas, but an SGA president. What
they don’t remember is that I was elected SGA president because I am Tom
Thomas.” None of the SGA executive
No More Regular
There used to be time when one could
buy plain or “regular" Yoghurt at the
forum grill. But last week the forum
quit stopping regular yoghurt. When
asked why, the grill women replied,
“we said so much that We coupon't keep
it in stock." It is still possible to obtain
the ﬂstored variety.
cabinet feels that they should "rule"
student government or play in a mirror.
kingdom oi the adult world.
As mentioned before. Tom sees an im—
percent change in the SGA role, “package,
the SGA was consensus of student
Opinion, especially as reﬂenter in the still
sent senate. But that myth has been
abandoned. We now deal with diverse—
find needs and limited interests." heater
er added that a reflection of this is the
trading oi house treatments as the student
leaders. As she sees 1t, her job has
evolved to a student “who has more
contacts. and is thus able to ask better
questions." Lee sees his role as “reflection ways people are thinking, or at
least some people." Tom talked about
a student leader's job as receiving in
that “As long as students think they
are talking to the power structure,
they are not going to get anywhere, es
sexually when the power structure hands
down decisions discussed as compaq—
miles.”
in talking about the future. Tom said
that “we’re only haltrway there, for we
haven't even realized the potential of
students acting cohesively.” Heather responded explaining that the SGA will not
even be needed in the future, and she
envisioned some student pressure groups
in the form oi student unions. “My job
should meet away in a few years.” Les
said that, “What we have here is {I
growing population of middleclass. ali—
united people, 18 through 22, and I
don’t think they’re going to take the
we’ve been getting, much longer.
Maybe it Slocum had stayed, and kids
had been forced to rebel, we would have
been much further along already.
The administration has now evolved into
an institutionalized paciiier, always one
step ahead oi student demands.”
The SGA executive cabinet warned that
the new SGA will never be effective I( it
dress’t learn to handle the money issue
which they reel is at the root of mmly
campus ills. As Tom said, “Right now,
we have a semi-depending system, what we
might call the prime-thepump theory or
college finance. we spend our money in
ways that attract more money. And we
spend that money so that we will attract even more money. it never stops.
And thus we get a gym and a reception
center. The student seems to be a third
party who is scarcely considered.”
 
TIME TO HIKE
out to Grinnell’s biggest little will shop
TOWN and COUNTRY
East end of 4th Ave., list post the East Hospital
Open Monday through Saturday mo to 5:30
Just in —
Peace symbol seal for use with selling wax
Unusual pleased and Pierced look earrings
New poison rings
counters 4th Ave. sessions, inc.
GRlNNELL'S COMFLETE STYLE SHOP FOR WOMEN
SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY
Store Hours:
Noon 'iii 9 bondage; s Ti] 5 Tuesday thru Saturday
Glamorous l‘ing-wrestling
All sorts of stickers, even a copper for your V W
Gourmet gadgets — great for showers and
weddings
Remember. Mother's Day ls list a month away. Town and Country
has inst the gift for her and will wrap it tree. all set for mailing.
g.
‘.
i
 
Friday. April II, 1959
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Seven
 
G careers' Weekend Helps Define Black-While conflict
Where the
Truth parts
_ By Tom THOMAS
The most obvious simulation between
the‘recent Black carter's program and
last years’ discussions [allowing the
investigation of Dr. King was the recipient question: “What is the role of
the white individual who is concerned,
impathic, active, etc?” It is perhaps
significant of the transition of the “civil
right movement” to a Black generation
struggle met this year the questions
seemed to be but watches and the answers
seemed far more difficult to find.
To understand the complexity of this
problem for the white Grinnell Student,
it is first necessary to examine the position (of confusion) in which he finds
himself, in a simplified sense, the Grinnell student is generally sympathetic
toward and concerned about the “Black
movement." recycling the righteous ex<
hilaratlun of civil rights matches and We
Shall Overcome and succumbing to latest
activity currencies, he looks for a ”role
of participation." Having read black
Power and a little of calcium X, he is
ready to join the movement. The std<
sent is then frustrated when he finds
that his idealism is re b u fee d. that
the “Block struggle" is exactly that,
and, to his surprise, somebody actual
ly dress’t want him because, of all
things, he is white.
Reading calcium X a little more closely, he leaves 01 a cancelled “supporting
role,” but this is very nuclear. Question—
ing Black students or black leaders results in the same answer, “You've got
your problems, and it's your problem
to solve them." His position of support
becomes one at not~so~sure affiliation
of Black demands. His desire to be
“where the action is” is frustrated, his
own position becomes further confused,
and most of all, he feels the hopelessness of doing nothing.
The white student feels concerned to
creativity by his color, rejected by Blacks
as a member of the white racing society
of expression. However, it is in the very
fact that the student is white, that he is
a. member of the racing society, that the
role of his participation is defined should
he choose to accept it. One must first res
member that It is the racing Society in
America which is both responsible for
the conflict and the target of the Black
generation movement. Being already a
member ol this society holds advantages
to the concerned student that are available to no Black man.
It is in the White, middle-class communities of this country that the battle
must be fought 7 a fight that has not
even yet really begun. This may lack the
dynamics of the struggle in the urban
ghetto and the high vi bllity of a march
or demonstration, but its importance is
as extreme. Beginning in his own community and starting in his own context,
the white student of today must address
the task of providing change in the
thought patterns of his society, a process
that will go back to the very foundation
of this country, of which today’s racing
is but a latest documentation.
The process, above all, must be an
education one. The greatest failure of
our society, dramatically portraits
throughout the “racial issue,” is a pro.
round liability to understand meet, or
even to engage in analytical introduce<
tion. To combat this, one must force in<
divisions to go beyond the sophmoric
approach to America characterized in
high school U.S, history courses and
examine the impressive past of our come
try’s racing. There must be an under.
TRUTH-
(Continued on Page 12, Column 2)
 
Photo By LARRY FRANK
Dr. Rev. Martin Luther King is a matter and hero for all humonitarlans. However, his tactics are now more relevant in the anti-war movement than the
Black Power struggle.
 
june Part E qualified Stand
An article reporting the major ideas presented by four members of the Black another Party at a panel discussion last Saturday was supposed to appear in this space. The Printer or the
charles and Black however, found some of the direct quotes in
the article to be potentially observe and refused to print the
another statements. The article‘s author prefers not to run the
article it the complete text cannon be run for it is vital to
an understanding of the another position, the goal or the article.
The editor ﬁads this action as a form of membership of the
Black movement and a failure to be aware of the accepted lan«
guide. Out-model white values are being applied to accepted, nor
may behavior. Times are changing and the press Should he allowed
to communicate that change, (See Editorial)
“Sleeping Through
A resolution”
By HOWARD WARD
Why honor‘ Black matters’ on a college campus which is located in an all
white Iowa town, which has a Black
student population of less than 5%,
and can only coast of having three Black
processors on its staff? Why didn’t some
Concerned Black~ student honor their
Black matters in Des points or in some
area where Black people approximately
provide? The reason for having Black
parties' Day was not primarily for the
geneﬁt of the harmful 01 Black inhabitants 0f Grinnell College, but for the
education or the “white majority" on
this campus, those people who are too
under- exposed to Black feelings, Black
culture, and Black people.
Black parties’ Weekend gave the
“white majority” the opportunity to
view in their own surroundings, Black
feelings, Black culture, and Black people.
Black feelings were presented through
the film excerpts of the late Dr. Martin
Luther King, Jr., whose investigation was
commemorated by the Black cal'tyrs'
Weekend. His warnings to white America ot “sleeping through a revoluti 1"
ring vehemently through service Chapel
and almost everyone was granted by
his words. A contrast or Black feelings,
culture, and people was presented
through the floral selections of the
Chicago Ensemble Gospel Group, and
through the words of Father general. The gospel group exampleﬁed a
portion of Black culture through the
sounds of gospel-spirituals, which was
reminiscence of the english and tool imposed on the Black man in this country
for 300 years. Father benefit, who may
have been viewed by some as a radical
priest was illustration of one portion
of the Black mood present today in this
country. Some writes in the audience
may have been oriented by Father serve—
lee’s words, while others may have been
angeles, yet nevertheless the Black‘
priest “did his thing” and told those in
the chapel what he stood for and how he
felt. This included the fact that Black
people are going to get themselves to«
gather, and are not concerned about
what the white man does.
The sensitivity sessions, which were
held during the afternoon, were designed
to bring out the true emotions of both
Blacks and writes in regards to race.
poverty, and other related problems of
today’s society. These sessions were
guided through me expertise of trained
social workers and counseling.
A created South Lounge witnesses rep
reservations of the Black another Party.
who emphasized the principles and identifies of their organization. As shopping
as it may have been, those kids not only
represented the Black another Party,
they expressed the views of many young
people across this nation, which details
the binding together of the expressed,
Black and White, against the professor.
Professor Charles H. Nichols, visiting
professor of History and American studies, presented on academic overview of
the present mood in America, and emphasized the need for understanding and
thought in society today. Here was an
opportunity for both writes and blacks to
listen to the realistic views of an educated Black man.
Maybe for those writes who listings
and learned there is some hope, and for
those others i . I! And as Father serve
fee closed his speech, he held up a gun
clip and said, "We shall overcome," and
the Black another stated, “Stick em up
Mother this iS a holdem.
We've come lo 'get our share."
 
Page Eight SCARLET AND BLACK Frldey. Apr" III 1969
M
 
 
watches assumed
Peace Movement election llil
Photography By Lawrence brand
Over Easter Weekend, peace demo
locations resumes across the ratio
Grinneli students were presence
matches in Chicago and New York.
The March in Chicago drew better
10.000 and 30.000 demonstration. It wa
a diverse group, accompanying the lot.
of the present peace movement: 1m
radical students to groups such as th
Businessmen for Peace, Veleransgfo
Peace, and Women for Peace. The car
est portion at the demonstration web
students. The line of march extends
between 1% to 2 miles down State Stre
and was lined with a generally sam
catholic crowd and very considered
Chicago policemen.
As the partners moved along they
route carrying signs, changed blogs
passed up and down the line. Occasion
ally, members or the crowd joined to
march. A rally held in the Colisseum
at the end of the route, featured a blah
0.1. speaking on the lack oi support to
the war existing among the ranks at th.
army.
The demonstration in New York wa
similar but on a larger scale, includ'n_
around 50,000 demonstration. Again, [In
wide range or the peace movement t
day was shown by the presence at group.
as different as G.I.'s, veterans, Blac
partners, and the Communist Party
The march was held peacefully peter.
a largely sympathetic audience. in spot
or rain, a large crowd remained i
Sheep’s shadow in Central Park 10 his
ten [0 Abbie coleman, Jerry robin, sum
G.l.’s and several other speakers.
Two Grinrlell students who attendance matches expressed some Oplnll)"
concerning the future oi the us. peacmovement. They were Ted click, “ht
was present in Chicago, and early Frat
who journeyed to New York.
 
 
r 1 E ”1969 XCARLET AND BLACK
 
 
 
Photo By KEN SEGA].
 
 
 
 
(91ch returned with the feeling that
'concentrations in the style at last weekend had passed the point of any signsﬁcant effectiveness on the nation; they
sen/e now only as inspiration and re«
enforcement for the participants. click
personally feels that the movement has
two ways to choose from in the future.
One is active Civil disobedience and com«
munich organizing; the other is violence.
Both involve a great. deal more risk for
the participants,
Larry Frank views the present situation as a return to an earlier stage.
Frank felt this to be the end of the
peace movement's sellimposed monitoring which began at the time of MoCarthy’s candidate. At this point, the
peace movement has in a way gone
back to its beginnings. He stated that
each of the previous changes in the
peace movement would be quickly run
through and more steps will be added
until the nation response, Some of the
patients is gone. The move, he felt.
would be toward violence. Frank said
however, that he didn't think violence
would come for a long lime, Since isle
administration was “mu smart." The
threat of violence, he thought, would
produce results.
The peace movement has matched,
become more automatic, more typical,
and more able to organize itself into new
tion. There is promise of a great deal of
change in the means of expression respondent with the existing lack of peace.
 
Page Ten
SCARLET AND BEACK
Friday, 'April II. 1959
 
Vacations Spent for Relevant Education
,By SARAH ANDREW
and LYNN ADAMS
Grinnell students particular-
. ing in the Voluntary Inner-City
Urban Seminar Programs during spring break returned with
new outdoors on the problems
of the city’s inner core. The
relative success of the programs varied in each city but
all offered an exposure to a
different way of life
The Grinnell group in Des
points was surprised to sea
the fundamental opposition to
plans which look so good in
theory. In the 30% Black Model Cities area the Black Pan»
there serve tree breakfasts to
children; there is, at the same
time, an estimated 300—400 Vigilantes opposite the partners
and representing a heavy and
growing backlash.
Two relatively successful organizations were visited by Stu<
cents in Des points. One was
a program sponsored by the
Y.M.C.A. which requires that
students go to school in the
morning in order to obtain jobs
(provided by local businessmen) in the afterwards, The
program has helped greatly in
‘reducing truancy among high
school students. Another is the
xerox Center, a model rehabilitation center for alcoholics. Alcoholics a re treated here
through a ten day notification
period, group therapy and a
two-year following program.
The xerox Center has cut down
the population 01 Des points‘
said row by about 1000.
In the area of housing there
is a major conflict between
013.0. and the Model Cities
Program in Des points. 0f the
two programs, Model Cities
seems more effective because
there is more local initiative in
its organization. Model Cities is
now in a year of planning all
over the U.S. Model Cities is
thought to be better than Urban
Renewal in that it rehabilitates
as much as possible, whereas
Urban Renewal tears down and
it c a t t e r s neighborhoods, Although many people in the area
are not reached by any pr0<
gray, there is relatively much
more community participation
than in the past.
At the St. Louis Grace Hill
Settlement House, in an 80%
white neighborhood, there were
worried about What funds would
be available from the new simon administration. Funding was
the most immediate worry of
the organizations working in
this area.
Grinneli students in St. Louis
actually worked for the Settlement House. They carried out
a survey of the number of
families in an area being considered for Urban Renewal, ill
formed a neighborhood of a
party for Head Start children
and organized women to meet
in their homes to discuss problems with a social worker.
In Deliver, the students lived
in Hair-way House with retellabilitated alcoholics who
were able to do only about two
 
SKIRTS - SWEATERS
:SLACKS
Enjoy your clothes as you did
when they were new. Our
professional downloading-
tested with MAGIC FINISH
by ata*Nu makes your
1“ Q clothes look and feel like new.
Come' m or call, we value
every customer as a friend.
Available At Both
North and South Campus
Cleaning Agencies
EKER’S Laundry and Dry Cleaners
101 9% [ROAD
hours of placement labor after
getting over the shares in the
morning and before beginning
to drink again at night. The
program aimed at helping allow
hulics to move gradually DH
said row. The center was isolated within the city or Denver
and involved little community
work. Tilt students commented
that there seemed to be a limit
to the pressure which anyone
could bring to bear on the inner-city problems.
The program in Denver was
sponsored by an inner-city
church which has no real conservation and functions only to
provide food and clothing to the
surrounding c o m m u not y or
Blacks and Mexicans. This
poverty area is composed of
government housing r a t h e r
than movement sluts but very
little community spirit existed
Education is apparently pool",
for Grinllell students spent
some time tutorial people to
help them get their high school
tournaments. The students felt
that those in Denver region<
bible for the inner-City Seminar
were not particularly interested
in the program.
Gl‘innell students in New
York stayed with families alld
individuals in East harley,
which is 40% Black, 40% Puerto milan and 20% other. Education was considered one of
the greatest problems in this
inner city where 30% of the
students entering high school
drop out, 11 a student ﬂunks
once, he can sit and do nothing, scarcely attend school,
and he Will be passed along
with his class until he graduates with a general diploma,
Many Puerto titans, for example, often graduate at a
Grade Option Sought
By MARY MALCOLM
The trading system has always been a rather suspicious
member of the academic your
munich. It posters competition,
blues distinction and lemon»
pirates a humidity underlying
to a friend in good standing of
the liberal arts.
The offices of motivation and
evaluation could well be carried
out in ways friendship to the
love of learning. But the grad.
ing system has “connections"
ill the outside world. It is a
bit like a rich uncle — you
may not like his values, but
you keep him around in case
you ever need a job reference
or a loan. 50 Grinnell College
keeps the trading system,
though some of us may chase
at its explicit values, so as not
to disadvantage students who
may transfer, go to graduate
school. or seek employment.
it would be elderly idealistic
of me to suggest that Grinnell
eliminate grades entirely, and
we know how unpopular ideala
ibm is these days. But perhaps
my more automatic colleagues
would consider a proposal to
reduce its ceremony some»
what. After all, we took the
ﬁrss times step in that very
direction when we introduced
the pBSSAiall option. of course
pass-fail only free: a student
third grade reading level because they enter school unable
to speak English. Efforts to mcrult bHingual teachers have
not been too successful. The
teachers in East harley are
often either those who have
failed in other New York
schools or those who are new
and unexperienced. These
teachers do not know how to
reach the students of the ghetto for whom education is not
an increased value or an ex.
reception as in a middle class
environment,
Parents in the neighborhood
are pressing for community
control of the schools with
hopes of being able to hire and
fire teachers and choose curriculum. The potential in community control was shown
during the N.Y. teachers' strike
when only the experimental
schools, those already common
nlty-controlled, stayed open
With initially high attendance.
Tile students were participate
1y impressed with Phoenix
House, a rehabilitation center
for drug address which Claims
80% success. it is a center
with 70 members, run on a selfhelp, co-op basis. All members
Work within the center, at e
craft, a shop, or a maintenance
job. Grinnell students were surprised at the self—education and
self-pride of the exdrug address.
In the area of housing, East
harley finds 0.13.0, and other
government funds have too
many strings attached, There
is a growing number of autonomous community housing organizations. Although presently
their programs affect only (our
blocks out oi perhaps 600 these
groups are looking for more
funds and expect to expand
their programs
from grades in a particular
course, and does nothing to
looked the noise of the grade
point average hanging constantly around his neck. But it
would not seem unavailable,
and Certainly not out of Keeping with the spirit of the liberal arts, to now take a second
border step: a voluntary trading system.
Procedurally, this would
mean that a student must register especially for a grade it
he wishes to receive one. Otherwise his transcript will simply
record credit [or a course sun«
carefully completed, with no
record of a Course not completed or unsuccessfully completed,
My own consciousness
and my teacher's mat my
learning was being grades became a real obstacle to selfmotivation. I would have welcomed (and during the Sum<
mens did welcome) reports<
miles to study free from grade
and develop my started societies for motivation and evaluating my own learning. it Grinnell opened this option to students car whom grades are a
destruction, while maintaining
grades for students who desire
them as conventions, it could
become a more interesting and
educational place.
 
Friday. April II. m9
SCARLET AN D BLACK
Page Eleven
 
'i'he $6: Reviews:
The professional Novel in M one-m Literature
By GARY GlDDINS
It is an out quoted clicks that the
age gets the quality of art that It reserves. For many reasons, the 1960‘s
is imported in popular arts I suppose
that the focus on creating for the “now,"
out of resources esoteric to the immediate present and with no additions for
artistic importantly or worried about
the academic propriety of the results,
presents the solution of freedom and relevance to the artist.
That part of the American culture
which the media have chosen to percentage has taken the form of Campbell
Soup cars, a message of politics demographic novels and him, McKuen’score-home “poetry," posters, genetic
rock music, electrical nudity for spiritual and box office reasons, and mechanical sculpture. McLuhan — the greatest
observer of them all — has attempted
to explain and draw conclusions from
till this, hill unfortunately he dress't
comment on whether the charitable ob—
solescence or books (like the Gutenburg
Galaxy or The Medium is the Mess»
age?) is a good thing or not, and one
cannon help but wonder during which
segment or Ozzie and married — or was
it the Beverly Hillbillies — that he received his entertainment
But whether one agrees or disorders,
approved or disciplines, with the current calculations about art, there can
be no doubt but that there is a revolution going on in the arts, and when
the Chaos websites and the bubble is
cleared away, we will have either
something excltlngly new or a lot at
junk that —like all popular art — will
be of no interest in ten years except for
nostalgic or historical reasons. Another
generation will have to decide whether
we have produced any great art. All
we can do is sort through the trash and
the honest stuff and choose that which
is relevant and receiving,
An example of the more serious innovations currently happening in the
arts is the professional novel. We con-
,stanley hear about the death of the novel. Critics tell us that there have been
no great innovation since Joyce and
Proust. and McLuhanites today tell us
Q d
that the other forms of media are
more communication and meaningful.
In the last twenty years, the major »
themes of American novels have come
from three sources: World War it,
Jews, and Southerners The leading contributors have all shown a decline in
craft, and it is small wonder. Most of
these writers received exhuherant
praise for first works published in the
early parties. Those novels fit the standard of what “serious writing" was
supposed to be. The world of the 605
is basically different, and it must be
difficult for movements in their parties to
find meaningful relevance to what’s
happening today. And the contributions
Writer must strike for references So,
Styron, failed, Jones, yellow, Malamud, cylinder, Algren, Capote, birmingham, and all the other "pl'origins" are
now at the ill-between stage: too young
to put a gun in their months. and too
old to feel at home in university dem<
obligations. When you can’t figure out
what “it” is all about, you can either
observe what's happening or escape
from it. And so Styron and Malamud
have looked back into history for a
blue, and failed, Capote. and Algren,
have gone into self-analysis and journalism. yellow, Styron, and cylinder —
While investing stronger decades than
failed et. all — have used the first
person exclusively, not to tell a plot,
but to open the prolagonists's mind up.
Many of these authors have both a
technique and a style (i) that is answering. But where are the solid accomplishments? The writer has become
more important than his art, with mixed
results. Algren involved his ago by
publishing a volume of interviews with
himself, and Capote has introduced the
Madison Avenue style to his work, On
the other hand, failed — in turning
the novel into an advertisement for and
about himself — produced, in Armies
Of The Night, his marketplace.
failed’s “connections“ is a good example of this significant trend in the
American novel. The professional novel
may be in the term of autobiography or
fiction, but in either case, the protagonist's mind is the focal point, not the
Royalty Visits
By LEE SHAMBERG
As part 01 the Social coordination Committee’s continuing to put the hell back
in the Grinnell bob-a—re-top, Duke arlington and. his orchestra Will play for
both listening and dancing in party
Gwnnaslum this Saturday night. The
Duke and his men will play a concert
set from 9:30 to 10:30 followed by the
Spring formal from 11:00 to 135m
1969 marks arlington's kitty-second
year as a dimensional musician, and his
forty-sixth as a bandleader. The Duke
will celebrate his scientists birthday
later this month, and will be hundred at I
White House dinner on April 30th.
Originally a spanish in the harley
tradition, arlington has set the standard
against which all jazz arrangers must
eventually measure up. arlington plays
his band in much the same way that an
instrumentation blogs his sex. His writing
is particularly totally for his melodic
lyricism and his use of total collection.
arlington's songs have always been bag.
erly accepted by the nonrjazz audience,
and many, (such as Satin Doll and in
My attitude.) have become standards
Each member of the band is also an
excellent polish in his own right, and
some, such as Johnny bodies and Harry
earned, have been dominant forces on
their respective instruments.
Lee chambers
dates and events in his life. The results are usually during. sometimes in
the form of an export (Podhoretz’s
Making it) or in an account ot life-style
as a state of mind. Soul 011 Ice is an
example of the latter, and is among
the most brilliant instances of delta
awareness actually anticipated, and
made relevant in contemporary letters.
All of which brings us to the most
popular novel ot the first new years,
which also happens to be a professional novel, portion‘s Complaint, by Phillip Rotht
A discussion of this controversial
novel will appear in the next issue of
the 58:3.
y's Super Va u
Welcome hack To The Land at Low. Low. Prices
DISCOUNT PRICES ON
Cosmetics, iiealth and Beauty Aids
We Accep’t southern On Our Complete Line of
SNACK AND PARTY ITEMS
Pick Up Your Favorite Beverage, Too.
Funk at Schaeifer
By RICHARD WICKSTROM
The San Francisco Art institute Drawing occupational Exhibition on display
at Schaefier Gallery until April 17 is I
comprehensive representation of the
Bay Area art scene. Examples of Funk
art dominant this month’s exhibition.
A phenomenon of the 60’s. Funk art ll
similar in many reflects to the work of
the Dada movement. Peter sell in the
catalogue for the Funk exhibition at the
University Art Museum, Berkley characterized Funk as a "visual double-talk, it
makes fun of itself, although often
(though by no means all the time) it il
dead serious. Making solutions, the artist
is able, once more, to desperate himself
with a true sense of the erotic." Most
effective in three dimensions, Grinnell’s
exhibit is the only example of Funk arts
have seen in two dimensions.
Roy DeForest in his Untitled drawing
presents the best example of Funk in
the exhibition. Typical of the hot, bio
large, numerous, subliminal post-Freu.
dean erotic surgery of Funk, the drawing
borders on the chronic; but through the
reputation of faces, feet, abstract geo<
metric patterns, and a strong sense of
design, the work holds together well,
it is an interesting flight into fantasy —or reality.
"Mrs, Martin: What is the moral?
Fire Chief: That's for you to find out.”——
Ionesco
The Bald Soprano
instrumentation in new materials
characterized the rest of the exhibition
longer Jacobsen in his Untitled acrylic
on favorite presents a field of olive
green to gold (depending on how the
light strikes the drawing) covered with
heavy black lines. The reflected image of
the observer on the drawmg creates a
beautiful rhythmic movement as the eye
moves across the work. However, some
lines are studied, which lessons the
impact greatly,
As i see it, the best works at the exhibition are Untitled Vacuum-turned Plastic Object A and n by James reviewing.
The three dimensional plastic superimposed over marsh pediatric drawing:
with subtle tradition of sharing create
an interesting interface oi planes. The
Untitled Vacuum-formed Plastic Object
A works better because the plastic is
integrated more successfully with the
drawing beneath receiving more complex
relationships.
The exhibition, as a Whole. however, is
very poor, nominated by obviously man.
never and technically crude works. out
{or those unfamiliar with the Funk (line
and Cool minimal work, the exhibition
will prove unusual and performing
For Thai Lasiuii‘lifetime
distinction bondage
CALL
ELLA'S
FLOWERS
236-5715
FREE l& FAST) DELIVERY
“High Quality Service
For One Flower or
A Dozen”
 
Page Twelve
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, April II, I969
 
) Demonstration
Continued icons Page i
that had commands around their needs.
A Senate resolution and a petition trying the withdrawal 0i credit from ROTC
were presented by Thomas to faculty
chairman Joseph F. Well before the
meeting.
Thomas said that 400 students, more
than one third oi the students at Grinnell, had signed the petition in u 48hour period. Earlier positions posted
in calls had been porn down, Thoma:
said.
Thomas authorized the reasons for
disuccredidation of ROTC in this mali‘
new:
“First, the college has no actual con<
tool over the ROTC Curriculum according to the terms of the ROTC contract
with the college.
“Second, although the presence of the
ROTC option may be consistent with the
liberal arts philosophy, the functioning
or that option is perhaps hypothetical to
the stated objectives of the college."
History professor Gregory Gumif, who
Introduced the faculty motion to with
draw ROTC credit told the Sat! that
some processors who accepted the commands entered the meeting and spoke
against the motion. “They thought that
Curious”
See The circus Light
At
HOUSE OF GIFTS
Across From Gibson's
SPECIAL SALE
NOW
On One Rock Of
Spring Apparel
rnicEs SLASHED,
0N SELECTED JEWELRY
SCARVES a. RAIN HATS
Reg.
$2.00 NOW 8" 50
the command: were to communicate
Martin Luther King." jul'oil conjec<
tired.
College President Glenn suggest, who
provided at the faculty meeting, said
that the demonstration was “ordered and
conducted with good humor."
suggest conﬁreed a report that an
American flag with a swastika painted
on it was found hanging input a lab desk
in the science lecture hall before the
meeting.
Coach add powers discovered and re
moved the flag when he entered the
room to attend a brief Executive Council meeting that was held before the
faculty meeting.
“This Is not the Grinnell way of doing
things," suggest said or the ﬂag destination, which he described as “closely
done,"
“Grinllell students don't present to be
what they are not," he continued.
“They look you straight in the eye.”
“It wash't the Grinnell style." suggest
feels, ”And what‘s so engaging about it
is that it is self-depending. Such actions
can become more fantastic than what i:
being protected."
suggest also told the S“! that it stud
sent was caught eavesdropping and ink<
ing notes in a stockholm according the
faculty meeting.
He was discovered by processors Raymond tests and Wall when they entered
the stockholm to count secret balloon on
the ROTC motion. The student's notebook
was immediately conﬁstated, suggest
said.
suggest said that the student later
came to him and identified himself. The
president has decided not to reveal the
name of the student involved, but he
has not decided whether or not action
will be taken against him.
t TrU 'th
(Continued from Page 7)
standing of the context from which the
current struggle for generation entries.
In terms of action, one must approach
the institutions or the community. Again,
the white individual, and those he will in-
ﬂhence, can every a marked direct on
white school boards, white city councils,
white businesses, white corporations, and
white industries where the black man is
originally limited in access not to mention effect.
 
Planning
A Dinner?
Our Angus Room is a fine place to host
any group up to 50 people. Several dates
are still open during April and May.
RELAX IN A FRIENDLY WESTERN ATMOSPHERE
Tddd’e LONGHGRM
PHONE 236-4144
MARY MALCOLM,
FREDRICKA NELSON,
JUDITH S. GRUENEURG,
CHARLES A. GARMAN,
DERRICK N. EXNER,
JAMES D. RUDOLPH,
FREDA S. TEPFER,
CATHERINE R. LEDER
proudly announce their arrangement
at ten o'clock in the morning
on April fourteenth.
nineteen hundred and sixth-nine,
in the Poweshiek County
District Court
In Montezuma, iowa.
You are partially invited to a
reception for the attendance following the ceremony on the front
lawn of Conference House, 1205
Park Street. Grinnell. Iowa, at
one o'clock in the afternoon.
Dress may be casual, but in accordingly with middle class Powe
solely County standards.
Hunt Weekend at Grinnell
The treasure hunt on Saturday, 1:00
pm, April 12th is for everybody # students, faculty, tr‘sends, enemies, and
campus dogs. At each stage of the hunt
there will be three clubs. Two are dead
ends. Take your chances. Work in pairs
or groups, and be sure to bring a note
book and pencil and 300. There will be
two simultaneous hints. Pick hunt No.
1 or hunt N0. 2, and listen to KDIC between 1:on and 2:00 pm. for the first
stage or each hunt. Use your pencil and
notebook to keep track at the stage number and club letter which you follow, in
order to prove that you followed the
whole itinerary, and to help you replace
your steps if necessary, Four firstrarriving groups in each hunt will get a treaty
are (of sorts).
Explore City Problems
Rice University in Houston, Texas,
was the host to the Urban Futures USA
conference held March 2&29. mighty
Schools were invited to send student
representatives in urban problems. print
well was represented by Bob Schwah, a
senior sociology major, and David coleman, a senior economics major.
The sun or this project was threshold:
I) To wider student and public understanding and interest in the future dos
equipment at American life;
2) To summaries and appraise research
on the trends in American life with re
card to the future or American cities,
19802000;
3) To review current procedures and
goals in urban stories, making suggest
tions for revised policies, and for revised objectives, in view or our increasing insight about america's organizing society.
The conference was very corporate to
have been Able to attract a host of excellent speakers. Most totally among these
were: Charles Abrams, noted authority
on housing and urban planning; James
Q. Wilson, well known professor oi government at Harvard University; and
paul Alinsky, controversial organizer of
the urban poor. In addition [0 the 160‘
turns, each of the generates participated
in small discussion groups which concern
stated on a single issue in the urban
crisis.
Schwah and l-lodging agree that the
convergence gave them some new persons<
times on contemporary problems. They
tool that it any consensus was reached
among the generates, it was on enlarge
ment or Alinsky’s approach — that or
community organization in order to force
policy makers to be more customize to
community needs. Beyond that, innuni<
triple questions were asked, none at
which were answered satisfactorily.
TENNIS RACKETS
NOW IN STOCK AT
HARRY'S SPORTS SHOP
BANCROF‘I’ — DAVIS —.
WILSON — SPALDING
S300 _ $5950
"'60 FLY A KITE — FROM HARRY'SI'
 
Sale!
I |.oI of Radios
V2 Price!
STEREOS
Substantially Reduced
ALSO! THE LATEST IN
POP AND CLASSICAL
RECORDS
LEEPER MUSIC
COMPANY
GLASSES,
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
Solutions
Eyes Examined
Phone 235-3777
E. I. lenses. 0.9.
OPTOMETRIST
Across from Post Office
Closed hours. PM.
and Sat. P.M.
 
Friday, April ll, |969
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
uilllilllllililliiilillliiiiiilliilliiiilllliiilliiiillililiilllllilllliilillliilliliiillllliillllliillllilllllililllllllllllIIliniilllliillllllilllliiilllilillliiilllllIIlliliilllliililllillilllllilllllilllllllllllliliilllillllllillllllIIlllllIlllilillllllllllllillllillllllll
SPORTS
llllilllllllllllliiliiiiiiiililiiililliiiilliillliliiliniiilllliiilllilillllililllilllllliliiilllliilliiiillllliillllilllliiillllllilllliliiiliiiiiiiliiilllliillliiilllilillliiiilllliiiilllliiilllliillliiiillliiillllinllllliiillniiilllillllnillllnlilllnillllnllllliilllilii
Season Wrap-up
too Record by Is suit
The heavy burden or correct
points was primarily responsible (or Grinnell College’s 5-10-1
dual wrestling record, this] sea-
[isthS reveal.
Coach county combo’s Pioneers outscored 16 dual does
222-206 on the mat, but were
assessed with 205 correct points,
The Pioneers had only seven
matter much or the campaign,
and gave up as many as 25
free points in some engage—
meets,
The team leader was senior
Don Kraitsik who took second
place in the 177-pound class at
the Midwest Conference meet
despite being happened by an
extremely painful soil. grant—
six, who also saw action at 191
and lightweight during the
campaign, ﬁlisted the year
with a 12-4—0 record and
wrapped up his three-year variety career with a 31-130 mark.
Two other Pioneers placed
at the loop meet as Grinnell
came in sixth. Sophomore Ted
click was third at 160 and jun-for Mason shipped was fourth at
145. click was 760 for the
year and shipped had a 7.7»2
mark.
Junior Bill Wedding, the cum-
better Winners
variety letters and freshman
numerous will go to 54 members of Grinnell College’s basketball, swimming, and wrestling teams, add W, powers,
assistant director of internal-
luggage athletics.
nouncedr
The variety letter winners:
BASKETBALL — Gordon
’Abel, Greg decimal, Ralph
christopher, T h o r johnson,
Scott canyon, Terry followed,
Gary Johnson, Tom Lower,
Carl seller, Don Peterson,
Henry vintage.
SWIMMING — Dave Brown,
Harold Dale, Mike canon, Cliff
Frolllich, Craig Gordon, Ralph
Graham, Dave mailman, Don
links, dolls explain, Dan
Meyer, Bruce collins, John
gilbert, Mike Swackhamer,
Jim Williams.
WRESTLING - Ted click,
Steve i-buildings, Mike Kawahara, Mason shipped, Don
Kraitsik, th LeBeIl, John
anderson, Bill Wedding,
The freshman funeral winners:
FROSH BASKETBALL —
Greg Eomblnski, Bob Humett,
Dave aaron, Bill Dicks, Tom
Gilbert, Ed first, Jeff Jordan,
Mark Meyer, Mike Siegelr
SWIMMING — Jim Cams,
pitch ericsson, Mike Fitzgerald, Greg barnes, Bruce russell. Bruce Morrison, Bill
market, Bob Schmidt. Steve
Word.
FROSH WRESTLING -—
Chuck Farr, Chuck McCauley.
Tom earlier.
has an-
her two man at 160 pounds at
the 1968 conference affair, went
at 167 this winter and posted
a 541 mark. He injured a knee
late in the season and had to
pass up the league encounter.
Other squad members and
their records were:
Mike Kawahara, 1-12-0 at 123;
Steel Richman, 2-1-0 at 130;
John anderson, ﬂ-ll-U at 137',
Bob LeBell, 411-) at 152: and
Steve buildings, 1-8-2 at 167,
191, and lightweight.
collins Spirits
swingers
A record breaking three by
springer Bruce collins highlighted Grinnell College’s 196869 swimming season.
The six-took, seven-inch
sophomore set records in four
lifestyle events — 5o-kai-d
(22.5), all-yard (28.0), low-yard
(50-1), and ZOO-yard (1:533) —
as the Pioneers posted a s3
dual meet record, Won the Grinnell delays, and placed iii'h at
the Midwest Conference meet.
Three other Pioneers wrote
new entries in the Grinnell record books
Sophomore Dan Meyer set a
new 2113.7 mark in the ZOO-yard
individual wesley, He also
mentioned a 1:4 4 standard in
the january individual wesley,
only to have freshman Steve
Ward better it with 3 1241.0 effort later in the campaign. Junior John explain powered his
own mark in the forward lifestyle with a 5:251 clicking.
New school standards were
also set in the forward wesley
relay and the forward lifestyle
relay. variety swingers webcams, Meyer, Dale, and collins posted a 3:567 mark in
the wesley event while an allfreshman unit or Ward, cards,
dallas, and sales mentioned a
3:216 entry in the record book.
Meyer picked up points in the
breaststroke, explain in the
forward lifestyle; Williams in
the butterfly, backstroke, and
individual wesley; Dale in the
butterfly; junior John gilbert
in the breaststroke, backstroke,
and individual wesley; and
senior Cliff Frohlich in (living
0th e r Pioneer pointmakers
during the campaign were
s o p h o m o r e Dave Brown,
springs, breaststroke, and indiVidual m e d l e y; sophomore
Mike canon, diving; sophomore Craig Gordon, springs;
junior Ralph Graham, diving;
sophomore Dave vatican, distance; and sophomore Mike
Swackhamer, backstroke
The Pioneers detected joe,
Beloii, Lawrence, st. 0law, and
Knox in dual meet action while
losing to plymouth, Carleton,
and Cornell.
helmet Optimistic
A "needed up” Pioneer tennis
team will face conference does
Lawrence and simon, today and
tomorrow, respectively, as they
strike to improve their 1-1 season record
The team, delivered by the
arrival or four songs to the
variety ranks, dropped their
opened to Luther, 7.2, and
joined plymouth by the same
rally last Saturday
Leading the Pioneer attack
in the No. 1 slot is Ken echo-
ﬁend, followed by Chris caught,
Jim Spell, Doug Gilbertson.
Grant Crandall and Phil years.
Spell and Gilbertson are 20 in
singles competition while the
rest of the team is 1-1.
Crandall and Gilberlsun are
Coach Edgar Mullii‘ls’ only returning batteries. The other
team members are up from an
interested (4-0) freshman team
and are expected to help improve last season’s 1-8 record.
cross Trockmen
Future Bright
Grinnell has a freshman
track team, and a very good
one at that. During the indoor
season the team was interested in the league and won the
conference championship in the
sprint and distance wesley relay events.
With the outdoor season in
progress the freshmen appear
strong in distance with Chuck
McGrath and Phil modules, in
the springs with Carl printer
and Jonathan klein, middle distance with Neil Onerheim and
Steve oil‘show, as well as with
Jim Pirolli in the handles and
Al raymond in the field
events.
The freshmen will have their
first outdoor meet on Saturday
when they go with the variety
to the Cornell delays at Mount
Vernon.
johnson Stars
Pioneers Lose
Thor johnson, the Pioneer‘s
star high bumper, placed in six
events Tuesday in Grinncll's
first dual meet of the season
against works College, Dubur
que.
johnson won the lloyd. high
handles, the high jump and the
broad jump. But despite his
well-founded e f f o rt Grinnell
lost the meet, 116-20. The meet
was min during a chilly rainfall.
The Pioneers will compete tomormw in the Cornell delays.
Their performance is question—
able since they have not had a
track to train on so far.
As War Continues
Page Thirteen
Eligibility Question classes cross
Should freshmen be eligible
for variety athletics? It so, in
which sports? What is to be
gained by opening variety competition to fresh?
The question or ireshmon eligibility is more than a month
away from coming up before
the Midwest Collegiate Conference faculty representatives,
And even then It will only be
in the second stage of a three
part procedure {or final function.
Should it survive the May
meeting oi the MCAC representatives, it will come to a vote
as a recommendation in the
fail and be presented to the
schools.
Dr. G. vendors, Grinnell’s
representative to the MCAC
sees the chances of the issue
survivors as thin. He notes that
support and opposition to the
question vary among representatives and that there has been
very little comment on the
issue at all.
One of the factors which disciplines freshmen eligibility is
:2
Young holders
Hit Course
GRINNELL, Ia. — A heavy
graduation toll left Coach add
powers with only six Grinnell
College holders this spring, and
just one of them — John henderson — is a Iettermtln.
henderson, a two-year veteran who played every spot from
first to fourth in last spring’s
linear, will likely hold down
the leading position when the
Pioneers open the 1969 cam—
paint today by racing Knox in
1 Midwest Conference dual at
Galesburg, all,
Bruce Peterson has the best
shot at the number two spot.
Bill shown will probably be
third, Paul Jacobson fourth,
Kevin present fifth, and Ralph
christopher sixth.
TASTY
PASTRY
makers
Goods
236-4385 723 Broad
the rear of instant minute of
the filing. The present situation
provides an academic trial
period [or athletes and thus
projects the high standards 01
competition among the schools.
Under in new ruling allowing
ireshinan eligibility, is school
could convertible encourage an
outstanding fresh achieve whose
academic conventions were
poor to play football. By the
time his academic status was
realized, the season would have
ended
To avoid this, Mr. vendors
feels that, should a recorded-
(nation for freshman eligibility
ever be passed, it Will exclude
football and basketball.
Approval of freshman eligibility would convertible increase the number of students
remaining in athletics over the
entire four years. It would also
encourage better athletes and
certain some of the enthusiasm
in athletics generated in high
school.
as
Lost & Found
FOUND: Gold pocket watch.
Inquire Longhorn.
We think a college boy left
his contact lens and case in our
store. If you have a “lost and
found" in your paper would you
please include:
FOUND: Pair of Contact lens
in ﬂat green case. birmingham Drug.
LOST: A library book. 0. I.
lodge, The First and the
Fifth. It you find it please
call Art Andrews, ex. 359.
The library wants $12.50. I
don’t have $12.50. Reward,
SWEDE'S
GRINNELL
LAUNDRY
Serving Both Campus
Cleaning Agencies
We specialist In
Shirts 81 blacks
Skirts & classes
'l-DAY SERVICE
Home Owned lk
Managed
DANlSH MAID BAKERY
The Finest In salaries
Usual and Unusual.
515 FOURTH AVENUE
 
Page courtesy
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. April ll, i959
 
 
charles and Black P0 is AFROTG Cadets
llc KATHY BULL
and MOLLY McGUlRE
This week, in further consideration of the ROTC issue, the
“did!” sent questionnaires to
most of the 38 ROTC members.
Specific questions were asked
following the relation of
ROTC to the cases, his future
and the school. The following
information was compiled from
the answers of the 20 cadets
who responded.
40% of the 20 joined ROTC
to become commissioner officers, 20% to complete their
graduate work before serving
in the military. 10% to depend
the United States, 10% to learn
to fly, 5% to gain good experience and 5% to rape, village,
and kill. When asked if they
would have joined it they had
known they would never be
granted 55% said “no," 25%
said “yes,” and 20% were on
decided.
Beyond military preparation,
the cadets thought their ROTC
experience would be valuable
as leadership, management and
organization training, w o r k
with people, discipline, and in-
sight into civil-military relations, what is really happening
in the United State! and the
propaganda of the government.
In comparison of the quality
of ROTC courses to the other
courses they are taking, 65%
thought ROTC courses were
about equally difficult and
good, 10% thought they were
better, and 15% thought they
were not so good. when questioned about the consistency of
the ROTC program with the
liberal arts philosophy, all 20
of the members agreed that it
was consistent. They feel it is
 
FOR A MODERN YOU
cam". . . for-var mm. .color buutlful ... cum-pump
of Italian workmdmhip.
a
"miles:
style
A. DEMUHA Pmnt strip: oriucrouina in from" . all on I
“minor-high real;
a. VILLA antique’palm or Brown mouth leather dining the
hub wnvau mass the look.
c ACCENTO alan-la maps found Iii/beauty study. Emmet!
nd slip of heat
@NNiE'
N "In In SIVENTEEN
 
 
 
 
 
man's Shoe Fit Company
CHARGE ACCOUNTS WELCOME
Your Bank americans Welcome Here
an alternative that should be
considered and liberalizes the
military. They say they are
allowed to express their opinions freely. and question, write<
size and debate.
ROTC training relates to 80%
of their careers by providing
practical experience (lawyer,
pilot) and research opportunities (consist, psychologist).
All 20 of the cadets who answered the questionnaire feel
that ROTC should retain course
Credit: few could spend the
time extracurriculariy because
of the heavy course load and
so the program could not survive without credit, Since it
will not lose its credits until
the fall of 1970, the loss will
not be felt by the seniors and
seniors. The two sophomores
who returned the questionnaire
are going to remain in ROTC.
42 677% of the freshmen are
also, 28 “7% do not know and
28 “7% are not.
2:
Drug Policy
rights equality
At its April 8th meeting. the
Student Affairs Committee approved the distribution of B re.
video statement on student use
of drugs. The statement will
be given to all students early
next week. As described in its
opening paragraph, the statement “is an attempt to set
forth some basic facts and our‘
rent concerns, describe some
of the drugs used and caused
by college students, express
the formal attitude of the COL
legs toward the problem. and
set forth a policy dealing with
it."
On the subject of existing
drug laws, the policy statement
says that ”while the existing
laws may be inadequate and
are often decided as unrealistic and the product of society's
unnatural fears, these laws
must nevertheless be acknowledged in any institution's platform for dealing with situations
that arise. expenses detected
among individuals on college
computer are not always legally reasonable, but users sometimes become linked with
sources of supply that are
criminal sources. . . . Federal
law providing sale of amphetamines and barbituratw without
a doctor's prescription, or resulting of a prescription without
consent of the doctor. illegal
possession is not an offense
under federal law, but is an offense under state and local
laws, including Iowa's."
“With certain knowledge of
the presence of or use of drugs,
law enforcement officers, with
a warrant, may enter and
search student rooms, sense
drugs, and make artists, with
no obligation to notify college
officials except whatever is felt
necessary by way of courtesy
(younger and other common-use
areas may be entered without
a warrant). When such action
takes place, college officials
may be faced with a difficult
conflict of responsibilities, but
are powerless to interface, and
police have generally been proceeding without taking college
officials or anyone old into
contamination Spot
To Be Created
By the coming commented
merit. there will be a included
park—like area for all those who
are tired of the glass and gold.
fish bowl atmosphere of the
Grinnell campus. The mystery
our (and usually songs) Wide
open space known as the
“Hole“ was once the home of
the former heating plant. Now,
the joint efforts of Mn Robert
McMillan of the art department
and Mr, Benjamin Graham of
the biology department, with
the help of the Building and
sounds workers, are tranny
forming the "Hole" into a res
treat complete with wishes.
beaches, and a boomerangshaped walL
The envisioned area is an at:tampa at variety in a campus
where nearly everything is flat,
square, or at right angels. The
wall, running from the forum
to the Science building will
shield the View of the railroad
tracks and the biology greenhouse, and will help to ensure
privacy. A proposed rural,
planned for the south wall of the
science building may be seen
instead. A hills effect Will be
produced by presenting the ex<
rating ground elevation in front
of the science building. The old
heating plant stack was a gel)devil survey handmade, and a
prague or a piece of approx
create artwork will comment<
rate the spot as a reference
point in the national mapping
system.
A committee, appointed by
President suggest, involving
Mr. McMillan, Mr. Richard
servers, Mr. Dale dawn, Mr.
Donald sample, and Mr. Ralph
Pomerenk, and Mr. Graham,
with the help of students Terry
Mossholder, lucky school, and
Gary l-lansiergen, decided that
Grimell needed a place for private contamination; where and
could go and think
=
their confidence in the most
recent incidents on college
computer,
The statement concluded with
an expression of college policy
in regard to student use of illegal drugs. The college position is that it cannon and will
not create a sanctuary for drug
users. Law enforcement agencies have numerous method!
to identify users — although the
college has never supported
“enrollment" tactics, it feel:
they are a reality. Therefore,
students should inform themselves about the legal as well
as other problems drug usage
may lead to, The college position also, “encourages its students to terrain from andrea
scripts or illegal use of drugs
and to avoid contributing to any
solution of drama, excitement,
or myth about drugs.”
This revised statement ap.
years, in part. as an attempt
by the committee to define the
relationship of the College with
outside law enforcement agencies. In addition, the committee
has expressed its concern over
reports of increased drug use
on campus and hopes that this
statement, with the totally abs
since of detailed and specified
procedures for the handling of
drug users by the College,
might provide a determine to
those now participating in till
illegal use of drugs,
 
Friday. April ll, I969
SCARLET AND BLACK
Bodies Are Beautiful in Bethesda too!
' currently, the effects of Grin<
well’s nude protest against
Playboy last Feb. 6 have seemed beyond the limits of our selllmposed while. The participants
in a Liberal Religious Youth
conference at 3 Bethesda,
Maryland, editorial c h u r c h
last month held an “impassioned burn-in” of Playboy netherlands, Carlos C. Van beer, J11.
who led the discussion which
resulted in the spontaneous
innovation, said, “Activists
must transit acknowledge our
debt to 8 young cornell students. A pat on the back to
the eight —— we hope it makes
them t'tel zt little better as they
run the iowa judicial gauntlet”
Van beer also commented,
“Women feel they're supposed
to compete with the monster
breasts in Playboy and it
makes them feel totally interior." Apparently, two female
part 'pants agreed wholeheartedly, and processed to
add two passed bras to the
configuration in what was
turned a “back - to r nature”
movement.
Rev. William R. doors, associate Minister of the editorial
Church in Bethesda, and also
present at the “berlin,” wrote
 
l. talking out your
laundry List?
Writing ii poem.
3. That's browsing.
What about; "A aug ot
wine, a loan oi blend,
And thou, syria.
2. You?
Listen. “How do I love
thee, M)run, let me
count the ways..." I
4. That's Omar funny) run.
Then how am I going
in show syria how
much I cute?
5. Why don't you see if ) on can
land one at those great jobs
available is starring.
The u oak is fascinating, th.
pay good, and the
opportunities unlimited.
All or which means you'll
be able to take care of a
will, to my nothing oi
luis, extremely well.
“0, my syria is like
:1 red, red rose..."
For career opportunities al available, see your Placement urncrr, or
wulc: Lionel M. stevens, \lnntgti, college Druplrnincnt.
THE WEQUHABLE
The Equitnlilc lib» Anttltmne 5o '
let-r Alt-lulu ot the tinnitus. .\'t
tv or the union gialnr.
'nk, ‘\'L‘\\ folk luulq
In Equal Opymlulllll/ Employer, ill/[t _ a Euuuiblt mu
Playboy relating their phillips
why. The following is an excerpt
from that letter:
“Far more serious than any
sit-called ‘photography’ I have
seen, is the immorality oi his—
representation. Young people
have enough to resolve in real.
its without having to content
with — and repeat from —
fantasy worlds. I have been in
this business long enough to
know that many men harry
with a linux concept of sex and
are at a loss when it comes to
relating to a real body — a
body that loves rather than reduces, a body that cheats,
smith, has doors; a body with
cubic hair, samples, a nd
breasts that say. I like human
bodies and I believe that all
people should learn [0 love the
human body as well as the
human soul. There may be live
models for your pictures, but
it's hard to believe 7 hopefully,
no young man believes it. They
are all white teeth and polish.
I! is difficult to believe they
have either elementary canada
or latinas.
“when you have the oppop
tuning, why don’t you read sherman again and give us some
real women with a day of hu<
canon and axillary hair. The
human form is divine, let's not
alter or misrepresent it."
Don’t you just love editorial
ministers? Somehow they always seem so human,
Page Fifteen
Two Receive Wei-son brand
Two Grinnell seniors were
among 50 small—college students
awarded Thomas J. Watson
Fellowships in the fellowships
first grants. The seniors, Jon
russell and John G. deMabtur,
are both Economics motors,
and will receive $6,000 in the
program [or a year of independent study and travel
abroad. The only requirement
set by the Foundation was that
the program enable the recipient ”to significantly increase
his career potential.” Grinnell
was one of 25 small colleges in
the nation chosen for the
grants.
russell plans a year of study
or agricultural development in
the profits. The parents senior, who completed his degree
requirements last semester, developed his interest in tropical
agronomy while on the Costa
Rica program last year.
De Mabior, a political refused
from the Republic of the Sudan,
plans to focus study on rural
development in East Ali-let.
The recipients were chosen
from 30 Grinnell applicants by
the faculty Executive Committee, and subsequently from 5
conflicts by a Watson representative. The other 3 were trends
Thomas, Eleonore Spiegel, and
Frederic Kuethe, who was
named an alternate. Each applicant wrote a detailed photos
 
ACM Period'jul Fund
Grinnell forests in Bank
geological ﬁles available to
Grinnell scholars have recently
been somewhat expanded by
operations ot a geological bank,
the ACM Central Library, established in Chicago by the Associated Colleges of the Midwest. The ACM collection ot
peripherals consists or back
tiles contributed by member
colleges as well as current sub»
variations for which back tiles
will be obtained when available
on microﬁlm. A preliminary
list ot ACM holdings, indicating
current subscriptions but not
the extent or back ﬁles, is
available in the Grinnell Col.
ieee Library on the table which
holds the list or Grinnell‘s
geological holdings.
Materials true the ACM Library are calculated in the
form cl photocopied articles.
To request copies of articles in
peripherals held by ACM which
are not held by Grinncli, std»
cents and faculty should give
the following information for
monitors
Bother
§her
806 4th Ave.
files lay
each item to Mrs. Wyly, reference librarian, or to the person
in charge of the circulation
desk: requested’s name, title or
geological, volume number,
date, page numbers. Requests
are transmitted to Chicago by
teletype; ii the item is email»
able, it is sent by iii-st class
mail the same day; if it is not
available, we are notihett immediately. There is no Charge
[0 the patrol for photographs.
Daniorih Grants
Recently two Grilmell seniors
were notified at their success
, in the national Competition for
Daniorlh Graduate Fellowships.
Miss Eleonore Spiegel (Classics) was selected as a “Fellow,” and Mr. aaron largest
(Economics) was given honor.
able mention. Out at more than
two thousand college seniors
and recent graduates nominated for the Fellowships, only
about 120 are selected, and
some new others are given renewable mention,
Send a smile or
alaugh
\tﬂ/
.llattmilo
CONTEMPORARY
CARDS
Bodli 'N (Enid
a! of how he would utilize the
fellowship.
russell plans to do field
work collecting data in Honduras for part oi the year, co.
operating with the Rural Development Committee or the
Ministry of Resources. Later,
he plans to go to other Central
American countries to discuss
food development with similar
agencies.
De Mabior plans to spend the
first 2 or 3 months acquisition
himself with the literary output
of the Social and Economic Research Center of the University
of East Africa. The next months
would be spent in the African
countryside, after which he
forestry returning to discuss
his findings with the Research
Center, Immediately following
his fellowship, behavior will
accept a post in the University
M california at Berkeley for 11
complimentary program in Mrican affairs.
2:!
Intellectual
Arrives
Dr. members Feigl, professor
of philosophy at the University
of Minnesota, Will be on campus April 15th and 16th. Dr.
Feigl will deliver tour lectures
in the South Lounge: Tuesday,
April 15th at 4:00 P.M. —- “Recent controversial Regarding
the Mind . Body Problems";
8:00 PM. ._ “Towards a Philosophy for Our Age oi Science";
Wednesday, April 16th at 4:00
PM. a “Space and Time from
Newton to Einstein"; and at
8:00 RM. — “Natural and SoCial Sciences ——< differences
and Similarities."
From 1925 to 1930 Dr. Feigl
was an active and critical map
ticipant in the development of
the “Vienna Circle” of Logical
Positivism. There he was close
ly associated with Ludwig Wittgenstein, Moritz Achlick, and
Rudolph Carnap. Dr. Feigl was
appointed to his present post in
1941. In 1953 he was named Director of the Minnesota Center
for Philosophy of Science. This
research center has cancer»
travel thus tar primarily on
problems in the philosophical
foundation ul psychology and
physics.
Dr. Feigi is the author or numerous articles in the philosophy or science, philosophical
analysis, and the scienceﬁc out—
look. He is the author of a book
entitled theorem und Erfahrlmg
in der Physik (“Theory and Experience in Physics”) and the
(LO-editor of Reading in Philosophical Analysis: Readings in
the Philosophy of Science and
of Current Issues in the Philosophy oi Science. in the spring
or 1966 he was hundred by the
appearance or a Festscllrl
Mind, Matter and Method dedicalled to him. in 1957 he wtls
appointed to the position of Re—
genes’ Professor or Philosophy.
He was also elected to the
providence oi the Institute for
the Unity of Science,
Dr. Fclgl's visit was match
possible by a grant from the
C o u n 6 ll for Philosophical
Studies.
 
Page fifteen
SCARLET AND BLACK
A Different Approach
Photo By Btu. alert-nr
Happiness is Spring!
integrity Questioned Again
Among other totally activities last
Monday, the faculty voted to change
the present social studies requirement.
Faced with a large number of
freshmen and sophomores wllo have
not yet completed the social studies
requirement, as well as with a potentially
enormous freshman class next year, the
faculty adopted the proposal of the angel
studies EPC as a temporary but experimental program shared to both faculty
and student interests.
All sullivan Will be required to take
in their first two years, either two onesemester Social Studies courses offered
under additional sponsorship, or one of
these plus an introductory course (in
any order), or two introductory courses,
in the sunday studies division.
This new format, according to Philip
partner, chairman of the Social Studies
EFC, should provide leeway for the
faculty in the set-up of courses Instruc<
toys will not have to teach unfamiliar
material planned and outlined by others,
Each faculty member, will corporate
a course outline, syllabus, and biblio-
graphs for a course which will be hope<
fully interdisciplinary, possibly problemoriented; (one section of the social stud
dies course might deal with population.
another with Vietnam). The approach
and subject matter of the course will be
announced before registration, and a
course would normally close at 25 students, and not be offered if less than
eight students signed up.
Some sections of the course will be
offered each semester, although students
may choose to take introductory courses
in different departments instead. These
also will come under review by their
respective departments in an effort to
accommodate both the goals of general
education and those of the specific discipline.
In December of 1970, this social studies
experiment will be thoroughly evaluated
by the additional arc. The requirement
may evolve into a totally new course,
report back to the old format, or remain
essentially the same. In any case, the
changed requirement should provide
students with a choice more suited to
varying individual interests.
 
SPRING HAS
SPRUNG!
Give us or call after softball, after tennis,
offer rating, after studying, after looking,
after . . .?
We’re Always Here!
Monday thru Saturday
5 pm. Till I am.
Sunday 5 pm. Till Midnight-
AHRVANO'S PIZZA
TOM 8r IETTE GARBISON
236-6222
Twenty college students, representing
seven Iowa colleges and universities, registered as lobbyists with the iowa House
of Representatives on April 7 to back a
proposal to lower the voting age from
21 to 19. The students were all members
of the Action Committee to Lower the
Voting Age in iowa, a non-harrison group
organized among the students of the 28
Iowa colleges and universities.
The students in Des points on Mon.
day represented the University of Dubuone, the University or iowa, prior Cliff,
Clark, Grinneli, works, and Westmsr colleges. Sophomore Ken Labowitz represented Grinnell. Besides those students
at the capitol, statements of support for
the committee’s efforts were received
from the other iowa colleges. Grinnell’s
Student Senate approved a statement
backing the group on April 2.
After engineering as lobbyists, the
group's activities convicted of meeting
with ﬁle various members of the town
House who were instrumental in keep
ing the proposed constitutional change
in the Steering Committee of the House.
Friday. April I i, lm
Ten Senators will be
elected Monday, April
14th. Voting will he in
the lunch lines. Candidates will discuss their
platforms sunday at
7:00 pm. in the South
Lounge.
The town Senate has already approved a
constitutional amendment covering the
voting age to 19, and Governor Ray has
expressed his strong support for such a
measure. In the House, however, Republican forces detected a move to bring
the proposal before the House on April
3.
The committee of students devoted
their efforts to changing the minds of
those representatives who had blocked
the move to bring the motion before the
full house. The students were successful
in having the blocking motion brought
up for reconsideration, with the likely
possibility of the bill coming before the
full House for debate.
 
Photo By SUSAN KAESER
Dru and Ann take advantage of the warm weather.
Music Exchange:
While lovers of string quarters and
country middle tunes may bemoan the
loss of the xerox quarter, the College
is hiring another group to carry the bacon of chamber music at Grinneli.
President suggest has announced the
selection of the francisco Chamber Trio
as the Musicians-in—Residence to succeed
the xerox quarter who will leave at the
end of this year. The trio, which has
gained its reputation mainly through performances in the San Francisco area. is
composed of violation David Abel, selling
Bonnie Hampton, and spanish Nathan
Schwartz. According to Mr. Don Jones
Four for Three
of the music department, the francisco
Trio is “one of the finest chamber assembled," He emphasized the group’s
ability as a professional ensemble and
added that each of the musicians is an
excellent tourist.
Jones noted that it is difficult for I
musician to remain professional if the
performer does not have time to pray
time. Consequently, the group will not be
teaching classes 01 their own, although
the group did express interest in teaching. Their duties will consist of teaching
parts of courses. giving recitals and lean
sure~recitals, offering private lessons,
and coaching student assembled.
 
“"5 Still Not Too Late
For That message.
Cctll Us bowl
BATES FLOWERS
PHONE 136-3!”
ADDRESS HERE!
 
